And a lie is the truth!
other awesome toppings you might like to have:
QPR 21/20 (Totesport), Draw 12/5(PP), Wigan 16/5(StanJames)
But she was dealing with something; something unresolved deep within her. She was childless. You see, up until this point in her story, the Shunammite woman had never had the pleasure of cradling her own baby. She’d never felt the tug of a nursing infant. Yet, I argue that she was a mother long before her womb conceived. The Shunammite woman was a nurturer and caregiver, a nurse and comforter. She had the heartbeat of a mother and it echoed in the far reaches of heaven as she attended to Elisha.
Neal decided to reach out to family members and friends with the idea through Facebook. Soon the original recipients had invited their friends and so on.
For some reason, I never once had been to Goebel Liquor when I lived in Wichita. It's on a street I hate driving on and was just out of my way from my house. Plus, I just didn't believe that a liquor store could carry a beer selection greater than any other liquor store. Even Saturday morning before we went, I thought I was just going to see a better organized Lukas Liquor or something. Even though many people have told me Goebel Liquor is the best liquor store in Kansas I had no idea how they could be noticeably better.
Can't wait to get new nails btw... one of my nails broke one week ago and
you may have noticed?
Do any of these kitchen tools rank among your favorites? I'd love to hear what tools you use the most when cooking food for your family.
The 1st four episodes centered around the 70′s after that we fast forward to the modern times with the modern characters which seem to have a total opposite of their 70′s character. I was amazed about how much Kim Si Hoo’s characters were so different even though they’re father and son. I like his modern times character better, the somewhat ditziness of his character is really cute all the time and just makes me want to pinch his cheeks or something.
Many Thanks to all who visited during the Glitter Queens October hop! I had a wonderful time sharing my projects and I hope I inspired you to get crafty.
So we all know that Paddington Bear came from darkest Peru, but what did he eat before arriving in London? Peruvian cuisine incorporates a fascinating mix of influences, with immigrants from Spain, China, Italy, West Africa and Japan all leaving their mark on what have now become national dishes.
January 20, 2011 Clip No. 2774
In the aftermath of the explosions, well-trained contractors and private security forces reportedly defended the facility against insurgent rocket-propelled grenades. At this hour, the firefight is ongoing and it is unclear to what extent the compound has been compromised.
What's not so hot is charging people around fifty quid a month for a service they simply don't get. Whinging about your broadband speed sounds an awful lot like what supercilious fuckers would call a First World Problem (blogging about it most certainly is), but getting vexed over consistently not getting what you're paying for strikes me as pretty justified. I lack the patience to detail the shoddiness of their service and their customer care, but take a look at their reviews. A lot of people are left spitting feathers, in what mostly stand out as unusually articulate expressions of internet rage. And why not? They've thrown thousands of euro and thousands of hours of customer hold-time at the incompetent cunts between them. I feel like we have too. Pay peanuts and you get monkeys. Pay €48 a month and you get the dimmest bunch of morons you're likely to find this side of a Kid Rock concert.
A womans Creed
French producer Jean-Christophe Le Saoût (AKA Wax Tailor)’s cinematic, down-tempo hip hop has been stunning critics since 2004. M3 contacted the man himself to talk about his musical background, the problems with fan-funding and how can copyright can harm creativity…
Much, much, much better!
I'll still do my garden this year, too, but I'm going to experiment with different things this time.
Someday, well, I’ll look back and wonder
This list has few surprises, but in some ways I find it a little disappointing. I love the fact that the boys are reading and embracing the wonderful series that exist in the world of Young Adult fiction, however I wish there were more new titles on the list. The Maze Runner and Department 19 were the big hits of 2011 so I can only hope that there will be some equally exciting new releases in 2012.
“Well, what’s worse?” I asked her. “Her seeing the movie or listening to some plumber cursing his brains out for a half hour?”
Pour in milk, 2 cups at a time combining the roux until fully incorporated. Whisk in the half and half and nutmeg. Turn heat up to medium high and bring to a simmer. Let simmer gently for about 5 minutes, stirring occasionally.
I had bravely signed on for a full body scrub (gommage) having been warned that it might seem a tad rough compared with what I'm used to. If a sanding that could resurface an oak dining table could be considered rough, then yes, this was rough indeed. The peels of epidermis I unwittingly shed on the tiles were proof enough. Ouch.
I used the skull and roses print for one side of the stomacher and the black linen for the other side. The jacket is black linen blend that is bag lined in black cotton; not a period technique but it goes together quickly. I couldn't find the cuff pattern so I made the sleeves as seen in views C&D and finished the lower edge with gathered black lace. Since my buttons are metal and fairly heavy I interface the front edges with both a regular fusible and a fusible tricot. I was able to make the entire jacket in a few hours spread over two evenings.
Around the world 2011 hasn't been that great for a lot of people. There has been some horrible natural disasters here in Australia and abroad that have struck at the heart of people's lives and left so many people heartbroken and without loved ones, homes and personal possessions. Some people have recovered but many are still going along the road of recovery. I do hope that 2012 is a better year for all those hurt in 2011, and also for everyone else at home and around the world.
As part of an overall strategy to rebrand itself not as a city of gambling and slot machines—not another Las Vegas—but as more of a gateway to outdoor sports and adventure tourism—a kind of second Boulder or new Moab—Reno, Nevada, now houses the world's largest climbing wall, called BaseCamp, attached to the side of an old hotel.
The beer provides the backdrop to, and the catalyst for, these social interactions that makes this event so special.
Last week, Perkasa Youth announced that Muslims should boycott the Bersih 3.0 rally for clean and fair elections on April 28. This extremist NGO insulted Bersih co-chairperson Ambiga Sreenevasan and called her the “anti-Christ for Muslims” and a “traitor” to the nation. They continued their diatribe by ridiculing the national laureate A Samad Said.
But why am I saying "you'll be buying" and not "you will probably buy"? Well, my fluffy hippo intimidator, you simply will not be able to resist this offer! See how beautiful, clean and white they are? Well, you'll get them with only 200$.
driving too fast
A while ago, I lucked into someone GIVING me two of these window frames. Actually, the dude was sneaking them outta his basement since his Mrs. thought she should hoard 30 of these bad boys. And I'm still not entirely sure whether I had a choice in taking them as they were in my truck before I knew it!
Although I sell online, I think my jewelry sells best in person. The chain pieces, especially, have a solid, sensual feel that people fall in love with when they pick one up. My work sells well at art galleries and by word of mouth.
12. Laughing lowers levels of stress hormones and strengthens the immune system. Six-year-olds laugh an average of 300 times a day. Adults only laugh 15 to 100 times a day.
Christian follows Jane to find out what she knows about his sister's disappearance and is intrigued when he finds her entering the club. He decides to become her lover for the night and doesn't understand why she is skittish and can't go through with the plans. He tries to keep her out of the investigation but when she refuses to leave it to him he realises that he needs to keep her close to keep her safe. He is determined to find Del and make sure she is safe and away from her husband who he thinks is abusing her. As he spends more time with Jane he slowly realises what she must have gone through with her late husband as she is afraid of what is going on at the club in front of her and doesn't response to Christian's kisses like a pleasured woman would do.
Tweak your categories and printables as you go until you get a system that you love. I've been using a Homekeeping Binder for at least three years and it has morphed and changed with our lives, but the time that I have taken to organize it has been so worth it in time saved hunting for information.
Label: Banister Records, Inc.
Could all that is lost ever be found?
Includes are not virtually getting fit and also a mere part time. Sports experiences are going to positively or negatively in a childs self-pride. Plus it are also able to develop and support other helpful traits in particular teamwork, intelligence, and solidarity.
Monday: 4 easy miles
In the freshness the forenoon air, in the far-stretching circuits and
Upgrade from 2GB to 4GB RAM cost: $ 45.00
So I'm typing this on a screen layout that looks like a Dadaist version of a web form, and now I'm just going to start clicking the cursor randomly around the screen and hope one of these pixels is hiding the "Publish" butto
Expected Publication: June 19, 2012
But it's difficult to know whether a story is really dead, really irredeemable, or whether it's just hit a rocky patch (see Linda's post yesterday - this always happens at some stage). I'm lucky - the fiction I write is relatively short. If I give up on a story, I haven't generally invested months and months in it. But even so there is that pang of longing - what if it had worked out better? What if I'm wrong and it could be saved? Am I giving up too easily? Is it just playing hard to get?
15. . . still stay home a lot & refuse to answer the phone. Watch people on reality TV but rarely speak to anyone.
BTW--because of a little spam/troll issue, I do moderate comments. Don't panic if it doesn't appear immediately, I will check frequently and authorize all entries for the gift certificates. ALSO--If you choose to comment anonymously (and not register with Blogger), please be sure to include your first name or nickname in the comment so that I can identify when you win. Thanks!
It works. It so does.
4. Reverend Paul Morton, broadcast sermon, New Orleans, June 1980.
I'm being challenged left and right with boundary issues. I am working really hard at recognizing the difference in helping someone because I want to, or because I feel I should. Yesterday I agreed to do something for someone and today I am going to tell him I changed my mind - I'm not comfortable with it, he can find someone else. That may sound like a small thing, but its progress for me.
Put more buttons on the handset so the switch to the aerial source is one button to press
The interview had left me feeling like this mother hadn't really quite figured out what went wrong and how she could've prevented what happened. What happened was really horrible. I read the book, hoping it would delve into that aspect a bit more, but it didn't really. It ended with the mom regretting missing out on raising her 2 older daughters, and simultaneously proud of them for finally graduating from highschool and moving onward to fulfilling careers and motherhood.
“He doesn’t dare admit the truth, he has no courage to admonish the police, and I think he makes a very poor health minister as a result.”
The first part of this year will be leaner financially. But that's ok. We just need to make the adjustments. It will be richer in time. Richer in home making. Richer, much much richer.
More photos of the garden I'm leaving behind, this time of the quiet little corners planted with a variety of stalwarts with diverse attributes. Herbaceous perennials, most of them, whose charms need to be appreciated at just the right time, as they tend to pop up, bloom, and then either just contribute their green foliage, or, in some cases, fade discreetly away. And I'm afraid that none of these shots do them justice, although clicking to enlarge will give you a better sense of what I'm trying to remember as we pack up to leave for a month.
Look what they have.
i am learning i can bear quite a bit of pain before it really gets my attention,
As the founder of a consulting firm that served foundations, and now a managing director at another such firm, I've lived through the decade and a half of consulting firm growth. I founded my firm in 1997 in my living room. Within a few years we were competing with the spin offs from the big consulting firms or consulting firms with ties to major universities. To the degree that these firms add rigor, analytic capacity, talent, and research to the world of social good they are probably a net positive. Those that run as commercial firms inhabit the social enterprise space - serving the social sector without tax subsidy and paying for it with earned revenue. Those that run as nonprofits work hard to justify that tax exemption by sharing otherwise proprietary insights with the broader sector. However, to the degree that competition between these firms results in the service sector equivalent of planned obsolescence, or the kind of tail fin embellishment of 1950s auto makers, we might take a second look at our utility.
Time for a new batch. Maybe wraps this time??
Now, just when I thought it couldn’t get any better, they launch the search for a handbag by personality. The creative team behind BagServant.co.uk are a clever bunch and have developed 12 personality types predominately aimed at the female market. The aim is to make choosing the right bag easier for a visitor by buying based on your personality.
And that afternoon that doth flashed by a bit quick:
The NSPA said they did not have a prior transcript of Savage’s speech and that wish “he had stayed more on target for the audience of teen journalists.” They also said it provided a “teachable moment” for students.
Unfortunately, we still don't have any "OFTM" news, and this seems to be turning into a "my favorite things" fansite. I apologize for that and as soon as we have some OFTM news, I will faithfully go back to blogging about all things Plum. For now, I have another movie to look forward to before our beloved Stephanie Plum movie comes out.
Of tree and human. And he within this snakedom
I just want to know what all the outdoorsmen and women would do with 640 million dollars to expand their outdoor empires.
I’m getting to my point I swear.
I start again
I know I have been very neglectful of you and the surrounding yard, and it pains me to see as much as it must pain you to feel so disheveled. This neglect is not done on purpose but still shames me and makes me blue.
Excellent – it works. And I hope yours did as well. If it did not, open the serial monitor box to get some feedback from the sketch. From experimentation the most amount of errors are caused by incorrect IP and subnet addresses. If you get excited and try to run the sketch again by hitting reset, twitter will reply back with an error – it does not allow duplicate tweets to be sent (over a short period of time). Twitter will reply to your tweet with a code which describes the result of your tweet. This code is stored in an integer variable using the function
The animation was not the best, but certainly not bad either. I guess this isn’t one of those themes that would require to have an outstanding animation to be applauded. The music was okay, and so as the voice actors. The thing that stands out here really is about the story and the realism of the effects of a massive quake in a metropolis as seen from the eyes of children. The last episode is quite remarkable, as well as some touching scenes here and there. For me, a 7.6/10 is fair enough.
Photo here is taken at May Day Rally – mature union members rocking the stage!
"Whether you think you can or you can't, you are right." - Henry Ford
After all of the cookies were completely dry, I packaged each one in a cellophane bag tied with raffia and a custom favor tag.
It caught my eye, I hope it catches yours. BoingBoing is huge, Gritinthegears is a speck of dust but maybe.... just maybe... my blogging visitors might pick up and re-use that title, and spread this idea.
And then there's Lily. They spent their first year together in an orphanage waiting for a family. And now they are just a short car ride away from each other. I am grateful for such a God given friendship; one that shares their homeland and first year. Lily was there when I couldn't be. She'll always be special to me.
There are few things that will make you as giddy with joy as digging into a marrow bone and savouring the rich and fatty pleasures within.
Now the great winds shoreward blow;
reveals the fairy tale dead,
1154. Another Wholesome Breakfast on the Road: Apples & Muenster Cheese, Juice of Beets, Carrots, Garlic, & Wheatgrass and Trail Mix from Earth Fare (Boone, NC) 9:12
my skin, bump life, into the people,
(I'm sorry for the bad lighting! I was in my basement at the time.)
- the fact that I even have the opportunity to go to school
NATIONAL LEGAL RESEARCH DESK
Writing romantic fiction for the past six years, and following her destiny to write Extraordinary stories of an average teenage life, PJ is a member of RWA, CTRWA, and YARWA. She is mother to two grown sons and lives with her husband and her dog in the Berkshire Hills of Western MA.
Subtotal: 85.7% B
So, last night Tim whipped up some spaghetti for dinner. What else is on the Karstens’ menu for the week? Well, tonight things have slowed down and I have some time to cook this week! Tonight it was Curried Chicken Saute! It is a new fav in our house. See the recipe below.
Fannie Mae’s previous guidelines “required servicers to evaluate and complete short sales, but did not require specific timelines. These new guidelines are meant to expedite the short sale process and make it more transparent,” Fannie spokesman Andrew Wilson says.
Hope everyone out there is easing into their own wonderful creative stride this week too.
Of course, in ADHD fashion, I then spent an hour following various links to even more blogs and sites that explain and/or show videos of the techniques and tips mentioned in the comments that I’ve never heard of before: Norwegian join, mattress stitch (turns out I know this one – just didn’t know its name!), Kitchener stitch, felted join, cables without cable needles (I’m SO excited about this one). Oh, all kinds of things.
Think of it this way, a good radio user today operating their same radio system next year may actually interfere with an adjacent carrier unbeknownst to them. One call from the adjacent user and the FCC discovers your channel is the interferer, a fine may be levied in an amount that was greater than what it took to narrowband. The approach of “Well, I didn’t know” will not cut it. This is the Federal Government sending out an employee to investigate something you may have not completed.
We chatted a bit longer, then headed home. I started loading my store, and the kids did chores. And Jake was in a mood. I think he may have missed a dose or two of meds. I can always tell. Soon, CPT got home from the "party", and I was so glad. I was at my witts end. And I convinced him to take Jake to Hockey practice with him and Joe.
Our weekend included a night in the village of Saratoga and entertainment by Emmy Lou Harris at the Mountain Winery. In past years, we’ve seen her on this same weekend at Hardly Strictly Bluegrass, with many, many more people in attendance. I hate to think we’re getting too old for the mass crowds in Golden Gate Park for this festival, but if you tell me that we’re just wiser, I won't argue.
You made the way
Married: 2/9/1903
Teachers are great because they teach you new techniques, correct your mistakes and help you to improve your craft through pointed remarks.
While there are no hard rules , ideally the singer needs to sing directly, i.e. on level with the
Obviously people do make the distinction, so how can psychologists say that the mode of recognition is the same? The answer to that question seems to lie in the test itself. The image inversion test defines a relationship between modes of recognition.
But is this not closer to what it feels like to be alive today? For are there not so many people like us in the world, our doubles and triples? Variations on a series of themes? Might it not be possible to find someone else with nearly the same Facebook profile as you, who likes the same music, the same books, the same politics? The world multiplies permutations on a series of themes. And in today’s multi-mediascape, might we not encounter our doubles or triples at some point? Can we trust them? And can my favorite novels trust the favorite movies of my close friend that I’ve known for years?
by Kate Taylor / nytimes.com
I’ll repeat some of the same views from allmusic.com with my own here. Does it sound like it’s ’80s dated? Yep. Does Eddie Jobson lack a bit in the vocal category? Yep. But if you toss all that aside and listen to what he does on keyboards and electric violin, you see exactly why Eddie was such a hot name when artists like Roxy Music, Frank Zappa, and Ian Anderson from Jethro Tull looked for a knockout player and came calling in Eddie’s direction, and why Jobson was such a key player in the progressive rock supergroup U.K.
One time when Tom was still 15 and John was still dating Tom’s sister the three of them had went to the lake Tom spent much of his youth at. It was one of his favorite places, where he had learnt to swim, taught by his sister, where his sister and him hid out when their parents were fighting, where he had had his first kiss… Tom’s sister wanted to bring her new boyfriend down to the lake for a leisurely summer day swimming and sun bathing, Tom had tagged along against her will. John had said “Let the kid come along, he’s not bothering anyone.” Tom had sat beyond the rocks, scribbling in his sketchbook and watching the two of them splash around in the water and lie naked in the sun. They had forgotten Tom had come with them.
"Rapists are usually multiple offenders. How many victims could have been spared the horrors of rape if kits had been collected and processed when a rape was initially reported?"
Maggie muttered a variety of curses in multiple languages while Sybil added a few of her own.
Today is the day that I get up before 10, because I have things to do.
When you first open up an ABS 1 kit you have a pile of parts that look intimidating at first, but I want you to not panic. Yesterday I explained what all the parts are for, today we can stick those parts together into a working kit. Do yourself a favor and pull all the plastic wrap and packaging off, take the directions and set them aside for now, and then lay the parts out in front of you like in the next photo.
so i am just praying that the Lord will restore some peace, some security. and that i will not jump everytime i think i hear a noise when maggie and i are home by oursleves. and that i will eventually not be scared to go into our home if i get there before jeffrey. because 'stuff' can be replaced...but the thought of anyone hurting my babies....it hurts just thinking about it.....
GBH PRESENTS PENDULUM AND A.C. SLATER DJ SET IN THE GRAND BALLROOM
Everyone remembers the Vegas post from not too long ago right? Here's the summary in case you dont feel like clicking the link...sad times in Nevada...no the Bunny Ranch wasn't closed...I realized that I had become an iPad user, by that I mean heavy user, by that- I mean... pens were being thrown in drawers and forgotten about.
and yes it still means
I love them that love me; and those that seek me early shall find me.
My Daily Jobs - Morning
To put an exclamation point on this: Cat Stevens was always in the background of my life during my college years. I loved his music. Every single song talked of a world we hoped to see. Yes, he is Yusuf Islam now. And he is still the picture of kindness. I want to spend more time listening to him than the political machinations that seem to be permeating the airwaves.
Leonard is a very small character in the movie, but his role is greatly expanded in the Deleted Scenes. As the movie plays, though, it’s a bit clunky. Betty instantly leaves Leonard behind to run away with Bruce, and they live on the run as Ross, Blonsky, and his hit team chase Bruce. They end up in New York, where Bruce meets with Mr. Blue/Dr. Samuel Sterns, who tries to cure him but only sorta does. Blonsky gets Sterns to hit him with a bigger dose of blood, which leads to Blonsky becoming the Abomination, which leads to lots of Abomination vs. Hulk action in the last act of the film.
himself to be both God and Lord,
3. Prepare to rent. If you can’t find the right property to buy during the specified grace period, be prepared to live in a rental property. This is better than rushing into a deal. You can even ask your buyer if he/she will allow you to rent the current property for a few months.
I love your sweetness,
“Did you know that your Aunt Elizabeth was an Old Maid?” I just looked at her. I really didn’t understand what was going on. I mean, I was playing a freaking card game. I was a kid. I never gave it a thought back in circa 1964 that the card with a sweet old lady was my Aunt Elizabeth.
What was Dave? A shepherd.
I am convinced that there are many people today who believe evolution but do not really understand evolutionary theory. I have come into contact with several people over the years who think that evolution teaches that acquired traits are passed on from parents to offspring. For instance, they believe that if a fish starts using its fins for legs, that its muscles will adapt to walking on land, and therefore its children will be born with fins that are better adapted to walking on land.
Oh! This was fun, too: Later another of my aunts accidentally sat for a spell on a large, real rat trap near our table at a British pub (“Danger! Poison!”)
At least the average loan size for modifications is increasing by 0.86%.
We had breakfast at one of our favorite places,
respect. Life in the UK began to seem pretty much what it used to be
I wasn't itchy or anything, but it felt like I was slightly burned or something. But I wasn't sure. I tried not to look at WebMD, and spent the morning Googling rare skin conditions.
Stolik glanced at his two men and gave orders in German. “Expect some kind of trick.” They nodded, and readied their MP40 submachine guns. The sound of them working the slides made their guide stiffen, but he kept walking, never looking back.
Okaloosa County Sheriff’s Office responded to a report of domestic violence In Nicville after Brittany Nicole Evanoff gave her stepfather $40 to pay off a $35 loan, reports the Northwest Florida Daily News in Fort Walton Beach.
About Nicole “Snooki” Polizzi
If you had to choose, who would you vote for president?
One aspect of this story that’s not talked about much is that at some point a good number of students, professors, and other Austinites got their own deer rifles and began firing on Whitman from buildings and other vantage points on and off campus. Witness Forrest Preece recalled seeing guys with rifles on the lawn of the Pi Beta Phi sorority house at 2300 San Antonio, while another witness, Buck Wroten, after being dismissed from class, found one English professor firing his deer rifle out of his office window, as a colleague fed him ammo. Austin Police Department Patrolman Houston McCoy obtained some high-powered rifles at the Everett Hardware Company at 2820 Guadalupe (now Ken’s Donuts), but returned them after finding that his long-distance shooting was too shaky to do any good.
Clotting TestsUsing the same intravenous line, they did several test and checked several markers for how blood clots at rest. They did a blood draw, after I rested for an hour, which was easy enough for me, I just watched TV and hung out and tried not to fall asleep though that would have been fine too. One of the things they were measuring is endothelial function, the lining of the blood vessels.
As you've probably noticed, I haven't had much time to post recently. I really hate not being able to update regularly because I feel bad leaving my readers hanging and I miss writing and my mom calls me every day and says, "Didn't you used to have a blog or something? Didn't it used to brighten my days? BECAUSE NOW I HAVE NOTHING TO LIVE FOR." She's so subtle.
54. I got a word for you in my secret language, it’s Chicka-mama! -
10 Love Ain't For Keeping
as final door closes behind
When Gina first came into our lives, our son still had horrendous gut issues. She helped us, step by step regain his health. Today, you wouldn’t know he is any different to any other 6 year old child, except for the foods he eats. Before, the differences were clear for all to see.
My favorite character is Hands, who was brave, nice, and always full of the adventure-craving spirit. He was always craving danger but was kind and fun to laugh at his and Andrew's lame jokes.
STORY: The Earth is under attack by aliens (again). However the invaders aren’t coming from the stars but from under the sea. Only a group of naval warships on training maneuvers stand in the way of the total annihilation of the human race.
What I got myself into was…
Those days are some of the darkest most bittersweet days of my life. In the very moment we recieve a fatal diagnosis for our son, I learned to cherish every single second God gave us to spend with him. Those are some of the most precious memories I will ever know.
I am so anxious to continue Lenny's story and get the answers to all the questions I have. But for now, I will have to wait. However, author David Morgan has been kind enough to join us and answer a few questions!
Here are the flowers and herbs....
In today’s verse we detect another reason. The Lord never told the remaining eleven apostles to get out of Jerusalem. James, the leader of the Jerusalem church was a permanent resident there. Back in Acts 21:17 Paul met with the brethren, whom I assume to be the apostles, and then in verse 18, all the elders. Why were they allowed to remain there and the Lord expressly told Paul to quickly leave?
Jesus, that guy they talk and talk and talk about, these religious people.
Then the LORD said to Moses, “Go down, because your people, whom you brought up out of Egypt, have become corrupt. They have been quick to turn away from what I commanded them and have made themselves an idol cast in the shape of a calf. They have bowed down to it and sacrificed to it and have said, ‘These are your gods, O Israel, who brought you up out of Egypt.’
Recently I’ve been blessed with quite a bit of good press and opportunities but it has just made me more and more terrified to live up to people’s expectations. I’m afraid its only a matter of time before people figure out that I’m actually not that great, or talented, or interesting
Wednesday is our family library day. Each week, after my sis and I get out of ballet, we get picked up and driven to the library, where I unvaryingly pick up a multitude of books on hold, and end up with a 20-foot stack of books distributed among the three siblings.
I received a copy of this book from Bethany House for review purposes and was not required to write a positive review.
I liked the book for its bold and different narrative but after some time it tends to become very depressing. At the same time what is mentioned in the story is the stark reality of relationships and family values. At one place I ended up laughing really loud where a name is mentioned as “Elder Brother Goddess Red”. You need to know the politics of state of Haryana in India and a bit of Hindi to be able to understand this.
This was an abrupt waste of time here, Flair, Gunner, Bully Ray, Kazarian, and Daniels all showed him how much they all appreciate what he has done with them, and here comes Gunner, The Guns, Austin, and RVD, along with JB.
Purchasing a brand new vehicle is really a main investment decision, which should be rewarding. Perhaps the most significant consideration picking out brand new cars is getting one you would like in a affordable cost. The increasing market regarding cars creates rigid competitors. Each company would employ several strategies for making their own vehicles offer.
Saameira: Wait. Look! There’s a shadow and it’s moving towards the flea market!
"That's too bad. You need to be baptized into his kingdom and then sell books and magazines so you can avoid oblivion. But don't worry. He'll give you a second chance when the books are opened, anyway."
Merry Christmas and Happy New Year to you and your's!
I am fortunate to know Maggie. At my request, she arranged my first spanking a year earlier and has become a very good friend. I also had the pleasure to spank Maggie in one of the cubicles. Before the spanking, I tried out my mean face with her. A peel of uncontrollable laughter told me I have a lot of work to do on my mean face. She suggested that I watch Mr. G and try to imitate his mean face.
Unrelated to the celebration, there’s a new decoration item available from the Limlight Gorge Rewards Vendor and I’ve added it to my Housing decorations from Stangard article.
18. Pyewacket-1967 (Its About Music)
The rest of the Old Testament Scripture is the story of the preparation and anticipation of that Deliverer. Satan opposed God at every turn and the sin nature of man carried on the evil. It became so bad that the Gentiles were given up in unbelief and the Jews became the chosen people of God and the race through which the Deliverer would come. So from the time of Abraham until after Jesus died, was buried, rose again and went to Heaven, God was
Ryan worked in Boston this weekend with his father. I sent him off Saturday morning with enough food to get him through the day, though he also scored some veg sushi at the convention and some chips & salsa.
that this process is supposed to make you look older than you really are.
*inexpensive if not free -i love to use what i already have or buy very few things to make something i love
The adoption has been finalized, and she’s coming home with a baby. Bringing him home to a new, loving partner, to a family and circle of friends already in love with this child.
“Render unto the orphans their possessions, and do not substitute bad things (of your own) for the good things (that belong to them),and do not consume their possessions together with your own: this, verily, is a great sin.”
your rod and your staff comfort me.
I had jury duty on Tuesday. I didn't wear this outfit - I wore jeans and a sweatshirt instead because, well, I just didn't care enough to look nice. When you know you're probably going to have to sit in a room reading a book for eight hours and then have to walk a mile home, looking nice is probably not going to be high on your list of priorities. I got released at noon, though, and then came home and got all fancified for myself and Josh. I know some women hate it when they hear others say they got dressed up for their husband coming home from work, but you know what? Half the time Josh sees me I'm wearing sweatpants, and honestly I just want to give him something a little more appealing to look at every now and then. Maybe that's un-feminist of me, but I'm okay with that.
As the group cleared out, Ben wasn’t the only one to notice the bum. The sight drew Jennifer outside just to speak to the strange man with both curiosity and opportunism at work in her mind. “You” she addressed him as she stepped out onto the porch and headed down the stairs toward the lawn. “You’re on my property. Who are you?”
Tools: Spellbinders- classic oval petite large + scallop
This bundt is based on Dorie Greenspan's awesome Banana Bundt in her book, Baking: From my Home to Yours. That was my pick for Tuesdays with Dorie and it was well loved by the bakers! I promise you'll love it. I added one cup of semi-sweet chocolate chips to the recipe for an even more delicious treat.
Pay-to-stay loans, for instance, or jail'otels – or even some weird outer Hollywood casting agency where you can try out for substitute imprisonment on behalf of paying clients. Should you be accepted, they'll take care of your student loans and buy your family weekly pizzas. Though I'm sure you can already be hired to go to jail.
I had a friend who was a regular cast member with Lambda Psi Phi, the cast that performed at Blackwell Theater (then later at a sister theater when Blackwell went out of business, then at another theater after the second one went out of business, and so on), so I asked about joining up.
Me: I’m not fine ok. I’m tired of fighting. I’m tired of fighting for everything. Ok. No, not fine. Want to quit, but yeah… it doesn’t matter. So, no, not fine. But I don’t care.
That not withstanding, this year they'll spend in the neighborhood of $200,000 on award show entries.
perhaps
The Strauss-Kahn legal team yesterday expressed concern that “our client’s right to a fair trial is being compromised by the public disclosure of prejudicial material even before these materials have been disclosed to his counsel.” Specifically, the celebrated master of acquittal suggested that they hold information ‘likely to undermine the credibility of the hotel housekeeper’ Nafissatou Diallo, the woman accusing DSK of attempted rape.
I dismissed this outlandish assertion with a contemptuous snort. He who speculates about the behaviour of seafood is not worthy of serious debate.
Have you ever been in the place where there was no light at the end of the tunnel? Where there was no possible help in sight. As the saying goes, you are at wits end. But God! Just as that phrase appears so often in Paul’s writings, it should also be in our daily vocabulary. Paul had done everything right. It shouldn’t end this way, except that it did for the Lord. Are we any better than Paul? In Acts 23:1 he said to the assembled Jews, “I have lived in all good conscience before God until this day.”
We reached the hospital mga 3:30 PM.
Bican’s first two seasons with Slavia saw them beaten to the title by their local rivals Sparta Prague. Bican would, however, dominate the scoring charts. He would finish as the Czechoslovakian league top scorer on 11 occasions to go with one time in the Austrian league. He won the Mitropa Cup (an international cup competition for central European club side and precursor to the European Cup) in 1938 and Slavia turned the tide in the league in 1940 to begin a run of four consecutive league title victories.
Nazis-SS psychiatrists determined that “absolute” mind control could be realized through specific tortures of the intended trans-generational victims from the moment of birth. Hauptsturmfuhrer SS Dr. Josef Mengele created one certain drug developed at Auschwitzt hat was used on children to induce severe pain and torture. Where the child would normally black out, and become unconscious from severe pain, the doctor would administer or inject the drug and it would keep the child from blacking out, and thus the doctor could than inflict greater pain, going far beyond the threshold of human endurance, which in turn would allow the mind of the child to became totally wiped clean, a total blank so that the child forgot their own personal identity, forgot how to add or subject, or carry on a conversation.
Welcome back to CAS-ual Fridays, The Clean And Simple Challenge!
Saige - (wailing) None of them caaaaaarrrrreeeee.
As tends to happen at parties the house grew warm so Mr. Nacho-for-a-night stepped outside to cool down. I live on a somewhat busy street so 3,4, maybe 5 cars spotted Nacho and honked. My neighbor across the street came outside, yelled at Nacho and another guy dressed as a beer keg and then went back in his own house.
So, ARE YOU READY FOR SOME FOOTBALL?!?! I know I am!
Well, the Southern states are now getting their share of the snow that so many other parts of the country have experienced. Here are some photos I took just a little while ago from my front porch:
For the most part, however, you won't need a book tour to do effective book publicity. Thanks to the viral nature of the Internet, you can do an interview via a blog, podcast, streaming audio or YouTube and generate far more exposure for your book than a booksigning in Denver, Seattle or Minneapolis that may draw only 32 people. (And your luggage will thank you!)
Atmosphere: It's a large venue (could probably seat a hundred!) and the atmosphere is inviting.
The children dried themselves and found a quiet game to play. Meanwhile, I went to the kitchen and fixed three lunches, which I left on the counter on top of three paper towels. At one end of my walk-through kitchen was a laundry room and a powder room. Grabbing a set of clean clothes from the laundry, I stepped into the bathroom and flipped on the light. Before tending to "business," I splashed some water on my dirty face and reached for the hand towel. But as soon as I'd snatched it off the ring, I froze. There behind the towel, and about six inches from my face, hid the biggest rabid wolf spider I've ever seen.
There are quite a few corpses spread around these locations. Not sure if they were zombies caught in the cross fire, defenders or assailants. Time, the soggy elements, and various scavengers winged, two and four footed have taken their toll on the dead.
(b) Commonwealth Act No. 496, authorizing the President to take over, for use or operation by the Government, any public service or enterprise and to pay just compensation in the manner to be determined by him and to prescribe and promulgate regulations he may deem essential to carry out the purposes of the Act;
So, finally after over a year of scrutiny, it has been declared that Rupert Murdoch is ‘not a fit person to exercise the stewardship of a major international company’.
-Bambi
Here’s another thought related to the subject of immigration. Back in 1971, John Lennon recorded a song called “Imagine”, in which he imagined the world would be a better place without God, country and private property. Ironically, the song helped him continue to amass a personal fortune, which he never was willing to part with, but I’ll ignore that for now. The song “Imagine” is still what animates the left today. Hillary Clinton recently condemned President Bush’s “ownership society”, prefering instead a society where all wealth is redistributed by the government.
2 Thessalonians 3:1-18
there is a young girl in my neighborhood. most days you can find her in her front yard with her ipod and headphones, singing her heart out. people drive by and laugh....even my brother laughs. but still she sings. she sings like she is jennifer lopez or some other superstar diva. yesterday, i sat outside listening to her. and no, she can't carry a tune in a bucket. but as i sat and listened, i smiled because you know what....she believes. she believes she is a superstar and i wish we could all be that way. i wish that we all believed in our superstar powers.
This schedule focuses on house cleaning. It does not cover meal planning, bill payment or personal hygiene. It is designed to get your house in tip-top shape each week and keep it looking that way.
Thank God that Ron Paul has finally renounced that disrespectful joke that appeared in his newsletter in 1992 about how the riot ended on May 1, 1992 because the looters stayed home to await their welfare checks. What a scandal. Some things are too sacred to joke about.
“Stop! Ah, no! Stop!” I couldn’t stop laughing, Dane’s grin was wicked, but he was so cute that I didn’t have it in me to punch him to make him stop. As he kept tickling me, I was trying to not laugh too loud so as to draw Ms. Spalding over to us.
4. You don’t care what people think about you as much as you did when you were younger.
“I want an apology, not for me, but so one day I can play this video back for my son and say Akian, you didn’t deserve anything that happened to you,” he says in the video. “I’m not going to sue anybody. I’m not going to file a lawsuit. It’s not about money. It’s about dignity. This is to reclaim my son’s dignity.”
There’s a woman I work with who is a devout Christian. She goes to a non-denom church in her neighborhood, and she knows her shit.
TechDirt wonders: “shouldn't this be ringing some alarm bells?” We have a similar contemplation: Will 2008 bring the same troll trend in Europe? We already reported a few times on Sisvel, Europe’s largest patent troll. However, the American companies that focus on patents, whether they qualify as a NPE, such as Gemstar, the newly acquired patent troll of Macrovision, may use 2008 to assert their patents in Europe based on the use of various electronic programming guides. 2008 also show an increase in NPE patent assertion activity in Europe, no doubt. Would be interesting to see if anyone in Europe, like PTT, can do some research on this.
actually, she was beautiful. she was older than me, maybe by twenty years or so. she had long blond hair that was freckled with gray, and she wore it pulled back into a loose ponytail. her eyes were blue, and they sat comfortably in a face that was full of both secrets and exhaustion. there was something – it’s always ‘something’ isn’t it? – about her. she looked familiar. i figured she was either a dream or a ghost.
The rape of Marsellus:
So if you wondered what happened to me recently, I've been working on the above and a number of other projects. And then of course there's the big distraction of Google + which just sucks up time. It's certainly very lively in the photographic circles, if you'll pardon the pun. Twitter, FB and all the rest are being left to one side as photographers get stuck in sharing their work and discoveries. If you're on Google + you can find me here. Contact me if you'd like an invite.
During this season, known as musth, a bull will fight with almost any other male it encounters, and it will spend most of its time hovering around the female herds, trying to find a receptive mate.
Last week at my OB appointment, my doctor said everything looks great. I've been very fortunate to have two really uneventful pregnancies, and I'm hoping this labor will go as great as Alli's did. I had to be induced 4 days after our due date with her since she didn't want to come out and play, but it couldn't have went easier or smoother. We checked in the hospital at 6am that day, and she was born at 4pm... the epidural went nice and smooth, the pushing only lasted a few minutes, and the moment of Dad-E seeing the baby for the first time and announcing "It's a girl!!" was just priceless. I know this time will be just as exciting, even though we know the sex of the baby, but just being able to announce it to the world will be amazing. I'm sure you wouldn't believe me if I told you, but we still haven't picked a name yet. We have a few we like, and even found a new one we like in the past few weeks, which we haven't told anyone yet either... we're just so indecisive about it! It may actually be one of those things where we just lay eyes on the baby for the first time, and name them then. Anyway, since I had to be induced with Alli, the discussion has already started with Dr. R about induction date possibilities this time. Since I'm due on a Sunday, she said she wouldn't be opposed to inducing the week before or the week after, depending on how I felt and how things were going. We're looking at dates, trying to figure things out... and watch, this time we'll go into labor on our own.
-Representative Anna Fairclough, 2/3/09
Each night before we go to bed, we thank God for giving us the strength and peace to have made it through another day. Each morning we ask for more, and He pours it out to us generously.
Once again, I've been too damn busy to blog on this beer blog. I've been working, running, volunteering, and etcetera. I HAVE BREWED, THOUGH. So bugger off! (He said politely while sipping an Mocha Imperial Stout).
If I couldn’t love you the way you deserved
They asked Gauthama to take his Parivara (family, students and any other dependants and to leave in a hurry. They started throwing stones at them and said bad things to both Ahalya and Gautama. Gautama and Ahalya left the asrama and made a new one at a distance of one ’krosa’ as demanded by them. (A krosa is either 500 bow-lengths or the distance at which a cow’s moo can be heard or two miles).
Despite his humanistic streak, and sympathetic views of the downtrodden, Cole's portrayals of Nazis and Japanese people are virulently racist. No more so than anybody else's of the time, however. In fact, his first treatments of Hitler and the Nazis are fairly light. We can look at Cole's treatments of Hitler, including some rare and previously unknown material for Lev Gleason's slick magazines, and see an evolution in his treatment of Hitler from harmless to heinous.
However the lakes save the day by tempering the climate and keeping it mild compared to the surrounding conditions. The deep bodies of water keep the air that little bit warmer during the winter, so preventing frost, and cooler during the summer as well as giving better sun exposure, as in the main the vineyards are south facing and slope down to the lakes.
allegations of sexual abuse is 4,127. Thus, the percentage of priests ix
eCoupons: Electronic coupons (manufacturer or store) that you upload to your store loyalty cards from your computer. They are deducted from applicable purchases automatically without having to request that the cashier manually access them.
I still need to do some work for school tomorrow--yes, really.
1. The Church is not Israel
Heat and air conditioning. Flowers and local honey so we can stand them.
Oh freaking YES.
You know what else is interesting... oh and pretty cool? It's this entire majorette idea that's brought in too. It's just this awesome dance that involves twirling around batons. Echols description of the routines never fails to please me!
The small woman in the green kerchief said: “There’s no proper road here, we know that…”
So back to the entryway closet. It's one of those closets where the space is hard to use and therefore typcially becomes a huge diaster. Case in point - ours has coats thrown all over the place, too many shoes hidden in the back of corners where they're forgotten about, a guitar hero set for the Wii, tons of hats, gloves, scarves and bags scattered on the floor and shelves - it was a mess!!!
Bonus kitty photo:
For-profit entertainment media hasn't caught up with the reality I inhabit, where lots of people get around outside of cars. Grown ups of different socioeconomic strata are commuting to work, toting kids, hauling goods, all on bikes, despite these continued assertions that only people who do not matter get around this way. I don't have any interest in perpetuating the idea that I should stay in a car so that I can stay away from the undesirables who can't afford to drive.
Don't point out where murders have been committed, especially if there are women passengers.
The first thing I found is basic, but wonderful in it’s simplicity. Coffee comes three ways, and there is a way to drink each one.
"Today much is being said about Black education under Apartheid, but the truth is that in 1987 at the height of Apartheid, six million black children were at school, a new record for South Africa at the time. In the previous year 1800 classrooms for secondary education were built by whites, with white money for blacks. About 130 new schools were built. If one considers the schools burnt down by blacks at the same time the education standards of blacks could have been even higher.
When doing all this research online I came across a Swedish website, a closed forum for parents with kids that has got cerebral palsy. I could find tonnes of valuable information and it was kind of good to hear and see how they do it in my home country. This is how I came across Inerventions “Elektrodress”. Some of the parents had used this fairly new invention with anything from good to amazing results on their kids.
The Year of Session Beer is not here yet. It's coming. When it gets here, we're going to drink to it. Cheers!
Lest love should make you dizzy, and pain should make you drunk
This part cracked me up, said by the reporter...something like, "Moms today are turning to other moms for advice rather than the experts."
Firstly I think I want to reiterate a point just because this is my soap box or milk crate or whatever, and I can do whatever I damn well want with it.
The announcement instantly cures him. In his bathroom he starts to sing, "It's Saturday, It's Saturday! Hey non-ee-non-ee and a hot cha cha!"
Amazon to Hill: Subs should pay for bandwidth they use, but beware unrealistic price caps and specialized services that play favorites.
- A weekend trip to Paris in a few weeks with some lovely friends (and meeting up with more friends there)
Last year Riverpark farm produced 3,500 pounds of food. This year Riverpark farm will provide the restaurant with 165 different varieties of vegetables.
I loved this book. It was well written, hilarious, and altogether a great book. PJ was, as always, my favorite character, but coming in close second to him was, believe it or not, that character whom I shall call Octagon. He’s a jerk through the whole book, I know, but he’s great on the speaking platform and with crowd control. I like characters like that. If only he was on the good side in Camp Juniper (not the real name, but close), he would be a powerful character, toga or no toga.
1 year warranty
3. In a medium bowl, whisk together oil, vinegar, Parmesan, parsley, lemon zest, pepper and remaining 3/4 teaspoon salt. Chop eggs and add to dressing. Stir in chickpeas, radishes, onion and asparagus. Divide salad among four plates lined with Bibb lettuce.
As you may have heard, from September our Virtual Learning Environment will be undergoing some major changes and we want to make sure that everyone is fully prepared for these changes.
Answer 4: Whenever your rights bump up against the power of the high office holders or their mid- to low-office minions, you lose. Every time. Wherever or whenever you think Americans have been free in the past, it is just because the feds (read as “enforcers for the elites”) hadn’t gotten around to walling that place off yet. The tyranny has always been lying there dormant, waiting to be used, and leaks through the cracks in times of crisis. But now, it’s all crisis, isn’t it?
33 B-13 Plato, Meno. Translated and annotated by George Anastaplo and Laurence Berns (Newburyport, Massachusetts: Focus Publishing/R. Pullins Company, forthcoming), pp. I-viii, 1-86. (This edition includes an innovative numbering of the speeches in the dialogue, which should be useful for classroom discussion, and a detailed step-by-step reconstruction of the Slave Boy’s geometrical exercise
I have more now than I have ever had… I don’t need money or “things” to prove my value or feel worthwhile.
Every year the thirty or so finalists go on tour and I try to catch them when they are in Victoria. This year they were on display at the stunning Tarrawarra Museum (and winery) in the Yarra Valley.
"Of course I'm sure, I've got today's subject all picked out."
I thought of bed but in another hour the animals would need to let out and feed. If I did it, that meant for a once my wife could sleep in. ( hey don’t get on my case – she’s the one that wanted them) so I decided to stay up the extra hour.
1356 D-VII/29/2000. On the Nihilism Threat Today. Beginning of a series of a half-dozen taped interviews of Glenn N. Schram. Regenstein Library, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois.
Thus, they literally physically emanate sexiness in all directions.
A GLOOMY OUTLOOK
I picked Erika, Joe, Will and Giacomo without a problem.
It upsets me that a drug which could help millions of people around the world isn’t being given the time of day due to the way the current healthcare/ drug development/ private rehab system works. It is so WRONG.
I didn’t manage to get many photographs while we were doing it, but I did get the aftermath!
I feel: like I am still suffering the effects of the flu I contracted last week
Other bloggers have covered this story but I am going to repeat it here as it is yet another symptom of where our society is going wrong. A yob is searched in the street. He uses foul language to the police officers searching him in front of a group of young people. He was charged and convicted by Thames Magistrates of disorderly conduct and fined £50.
Tonight I'm happy to say has been a quiet evening for my husband and I. Having a glass of wine and remembering great times when we were young, and believed in the magic of Christmas. Time goes so fast, so each and every moment we can come together as a family, should be treasured.
8. My new Breville juicer. I LOVE MY JUICER!
I have memories to last a lifetime.
TIP: Blog with your students – they LOVE it! Not only do you get a grasp on what they are thinking, but it is also an indication of what they know. It’s a way to check-in on their progress and correct any misinformation our there. My rules are that they have to have complete sentences and proper punctuation. I review each blog entry before I post it – they love to see it appear on the LCD projector in the front of class as I go through their entry. They help me edit their post if need be.
The question is: What will the powerbrokers who bankrolled his campaign want in return - and will Cuomo give it to them?
Going into these relationships is tantamount to stepping onto mined terrain, but only by looking into them may Stenner hope to inch toward solving the final mistery, the one that is so close to leading to Yvonne's demise.
ii. My Most Helpful Piece – Ok, this is maybe a bit of a cheat but I’m going to say The Last Hard Men. I wrote this way back when my blog was in its infancy and I had yet to find my feet. It’s short and far from the best thing I’ve written, but it drew some attention to my blog and was helpful to me as it gave me some much-needed confidence.
“I have been an ambassador and a career diplomat for 33 years serving in eight countries. My job was as a political and economic analyst.
This may be a post not entirely about food but, if you think food matters to you, take the time to really wonder what you'd give up to keep your sense of taste and smell.
–adjective 1. of or pertaining to the home, the household, household affairs, or the family: domestic pleasures.
Now there could of course have been a total ‘left-oriented’ interpretation of the same as well but the point is that right is much more likely to do this because of course it is at every point in the game of appropriating all history to present it in a certain way. The epics then become a way of affirming a very chauvinistic view of national identity that runs counter to all historical fact. And once again with SRK’s iconic film this worldview is essentially endorsed. Here the whole global Indian dream goes hand in hand with the ‘aartis’. The point is clear — it is only when you join this ‘family’ program and engage in all this religiosity that you can then also become the triumphant, successful Indian abroad (note how this dynamic is very much present in the diaspora which is why they are often prey to the ‘nostalgia’ inherent in this political message.. the whole ‘once upon a time in India…’ narrative).
I ate it begrudgingly. I stopped after a few bites to look at what I was eating.
Some people wish to downplay the significance. I won't. Having needed my wife to stay by my side in a medical emergency--I surfed into a sailboat off the coast of New Jersey and was lucky to get away with bruises and a concussion--I understand how important it was that she was considered my spouse. The emergency room doctor in New Jersey almost chased her away because she didn't have our "kennel papers," as we call extra legal documents that we had to get like our medical powers of attorney, on her. We had to rely on the kindness of an understanding nurse. Our friend was terrified when his daughter got sick in school, he was far away, and his partner wasn't allowed to pick her up. They hadn't married yet. He therefore wasn't a legal guardian. They decided to get married that night. They were well aware that they couldn't always make that decision.
Since returning from Afghanistan where he treated wounded soldiers on the front lines, Dillon’s made it a point to avoid any emotional involvement. But his unexpected guest has him dangerously close to breaking his own rules.
As usual, neoconservative/libertarians like Councillor Ford conveniently only make half the argument. They claim taxpayers fork over their hard-earned money and receive little in return. Government’s so-called ‘spending problem’ delivers few benefits and usually amounts to what the councillor likes to call a boondoggle.
Recipe adapted from Jim Lahey, Sullivan Street Bakery
We were asked to rank our top 5 and I honestly just can't do it
Here's the idea that I have....would you be interested in taking a look at picture's of my living room, dining room and kitchen (all attached to this email) and giving me some humble pie ideas? :) I would do practically anything you suggested (given it is within my budget) We work with three hundred college students a week...a few of which would be willing to help paint if need be.
While the poems were enjoyable and beautiful to read, the most fascinating part of the book to me was the Introduction by C.W. Hatfield. In this introduction, Hatfield discusses his process of tracking down and finding Emily’s original poems. After the death of all of the Brontes, Charlotte’s husband, Arthur Bell Nichols, moved to Ireland and eventually remarried. Over the years, the manuscripts of the sisters in his possession and then his wife’s, were parceled and sold off, especially after Bell Nichols death in 1906. As the Bronte sisters and their brother Branwell had very similar handwriting, some poems were attributed to the wrong sister when they were published. Words and grammar were also changed through the years by different publishers. Hatfield worked to track down the original of all of Emily’s poems and to put them back together in the way they were when originally written. Over the years he was able to find many different poems never published before that were scattered around the world on original manuscripts. I found it all to be fascinating.
And don't forget to link up with Lee's WIP Wednesday and check out the other fabulous in-progress projects...
Yes, all this was also true in Europe--maybe a thousand years ago. But not any more. And Europe doesn’t teem with crocodiles, ultra-venomous snakes and so on.
Each mom at the Mother’s Day tea received a yellow bicycle key chain attached to a thank you card for all their wonderfully important work. How sweet is that? I adore Victoria's dainty take on our favor board concept. I also love the diy stencil bike design for the cake which she used from this freezer stencil technique.
15 - Jimmie Davis - You Are My Sunshine (with Charles Mitchell's Orchestra) - 2:52
I believe MGIP has provided the perfect stepping-stone from student to young professional, and I am grateful that such a beneficial scheme was available when I graduated. I really recommend MGIP to those graduating in 2012.
I’d like to introduce my friend, local SCAR Project SuperSURVIVORmodel Vanessa. She and I are on the SCAR Project Cincinnati Exhibit Planning Committe to bring the SCAR Project Exhibit, which premiered in New York City last October. That’s the when and where I met Vanessa. SCAR Project photographer David Jay was giving a private gallery tour and as we approached Vanessa’s portrait she was standing right next to hers.
About 10 minutes before you want to eat, remove the ice cream from the freezer to soften. Set your tart on an upturned tin – this should help to remove the sides. Slide the base carefully off with a knife and put on a serving plate.
This may not be a terribly in-depth look at SMUG, but it's what I can do right now.
From what I have seen, Cédric Babouche’s award-winning film Imago (2005) is a beautifully executed animated short. The film tells the simple story of Antoine and how he comes to terms with the death of his father (a pilot) in a plane crash. Dreams and reality merge as the boy grows, until we see him at the end of the film as a grandfather, trying to pass on his love of aircraft to his grandson. The film is beautifully animated (drawn in ink overlaid onto watercolour backdrops) and has a very effective 3D effect, particularly during the sequence when the boy imagines his toy plane is real and he flies side-by-side with his father into a storm. French-born composer Thierry Malet has composed almost two-dozen scores, mostly short films and TV movies in his native France and has composed a beautiful orchestral score for Imago that is full of pathos.
Soften the butter in a large mixing bowl, add the rest of the ingredients to it and mix well. Smother the top of the cake with this icing and voila!
I did what any girl would do and cried, had a little tissy and saved it for when Dave came home.
Of course I don't want to give the marketing department or Captain Smith a hard time. It's easy to speak of these things now...because we know the end of the story. My point is just to make a point: sometimes we need to stop being stubborn. We need to stop marketing a parenting project—or at least point out it's flaws. We also need to stop seeking praise for our efforts, when we really need to pay attention to the warning signs. We also need to keep our minds and hearts open for any important messages that are trying to come through.
I am going to say this right now, this was the best PPV of the year, by far. Absolutely incredible, all of the matches delivered what they were supposed to do, and to top this off, we ended the PPV with a big cliffhanger. Can WWE sign Punk at the strike of Midnight? Will Vince fire Cena? And will Evan Bourne finally admit his lifelong dream, and that is to win a match and be pushed? Okay that last one might not have happened, but the rest can happen. Okay, Cena won’t be fired, but you know what I mean.
I am going to start posting more 'real' things on my blog so you know that I make mistakes and do not have it all together! I want my blog to be a place where you can go for real ideas and I never want you to feel like you're not good enough. The way I see it is if you are happy with yourself and have people around you who love you, you don't need the approval of anyone else!
Wunderschönen aber eiskalten Dienstag Morgen!
Metal embellishment
Chatting to Kevin later at the Penguin stand, he asked about my own writing and observed how critically important it is to realise one’s writing only improves by writing and then writing some more – and also, to keep submitting. He said if he hadn’t been published by Chicken House when he was, he’d have kept writing and submitting until someone had offered him a contract, even if it took forever. It is, after all, about pursuing and fulfilling dreams and goals.
lanes of interstate traffic to make the search!
Sometime between 5pm and 7pm, someone put a hell of a scratch in my paint.
After hours of combing through varied websites, I have finally determined my list of 100 favorite movies. They are not in order, since depending on my mood I would rank them differently nearly ever single day of the year. The top 10 are in bold, the favorite tear-jerkers are in italics.
Alfonso Ponce Enrile, Alva J. Hill, Jesus G. Barrera, Enrique M. Fernando, Ramon Sunico and Francisco A. Rodrigo; Honorio Poblador, Jr. and Emiliano R. Navarro as amici curiae.
Or so.
They have a three-game lead and have by far looked like the most complete team in the division. I still think it’s going to be Cincinnati at the end, but the more I see Milwaukee and Pittsburgh play, the less impressed I’ve been. Ryan Braun just went 0-12 with a ton of strikeouts in three games against the Dodgers. But one guy who IS having success if Carlos Beltran in St. Louis. He has five more home runs than Albert Pujols in L.A. Oh, and Beltran has five homers total. Sooo…do the math.
Dog-related links from around the Web this past week:
A couple of kiln-firing days later and I had my finished product. I'm not thrilled with it but I think it will do for a first attempt. I hope to get into some more complex layers and designs with my next efforts.
Your website MuggedByUKBA
8. Goes to church with me
My company, Kiwi Services, goes green by using all-natural and quick-drying cleaning products when we clean your carpets, floors, and upholstery. Because it dries quickly, it prevents the growth of mold and mildew, which is obviously not good for your indoor environment. Plus, the all-natural cleaner contains no harsh additives and is safe for kids and pets.
and I have to say that rather than freak out about putting shampoo out
Today I received the final proof, and it is perfect. (Well, perfect except for the typo or two I have since found, but I am NOT going to worry about those.)
Starchy (Red Potatoes, Corn)
and a Thank You Note.
Boxes are the stuff of imagination and curiosity.
I then added my bowl of trotter meat and stirred it all together.
The boomer is motivated by greed, the desire for money, property, and therefore power. James B. Duke was a boomer, if we can extend the definition to include pillage in absentia. He went, or sent, wherever the getting was good, and he got as much as he could take.
I thought about Peanut Butter, blueberry and Strawberry jello cake. But that seems a little outdated.
But now that I am again very much alone, standing at the helm, looking at the waves that seem so easily capable of engulfing this tiny vessel, and the dark skies, unsure when the storm will break, and how much worse it will get before it gets better….I must remember I am not a cork. I cannot control the skies, or the sea, though I can trust the God who can. Instead, I must learn to sail my vessel well.
Our turnaround came up fairly quick and not too long after I saw the leader going back. There were several friends from my church that were running. One of our preachers was about a half minute in front of me at this point, so we saw each other on the turn around. There was a lot of uphill going back, but I kept my pace pretty well. On a side note, this was my first race to use my Android phone instead of my Garmin. It worked well, but with it in my back pocket, I don’t really know what my pace is. In the future, I should probably stick with my Garmin for races since it lets me see the pace and control it better.
All the target regimes of the US/EU/NATO/GCC aggression for “humanitarian intervention” and “democracy” share this characteristic, they were governing themselves independent of imperial dictates. This made and makes them ripe for “humanitarian” intervention. The same pattern in the Middle East is extending into Africa.
Being stuck at home with a fresh cold is keeping me in front of the computer so it is as good a time as any to see if I can get back to this. Not having a clue as to what I am doing, or why, this is going to be a learning experience. I don’t know where it is going, but am hoping to gain some focus as I go. At least it was easy to set up. the computer is not a challenge for me, but I have become less patient with it in recent years.
In his book, Every Member Evangelism, J. E. Conant said, “The Great Commission is sufficient authority to send us after the lost, but it is not sufficient motivation; it is not the authority of an external command but the impulse of an indwelling presence that sends us after the lost.” Knowing we are to witness and do missions doesn’t result in it happening. It will not be driven by guilt and another program of mobilizing for witness. It is only the compelling power of the Holy Spirit within us that will compel us to reach a lost world.
This life -- the one with its complications
The story is told firstly from Spider's point of view but then from that of the other occupants of the car - Deanna and his mates. It follows them racing round the streets and through the horrifying aftermath.
Prior to my tonsillectomy, I had to have a History and Physical in order to be cleared for surgery. When this happened, the head nurse (hee hee...'head' nurse) called me and was, frankly, alarmed at my results. My Triglycerides were around 620 or so. She was stunned. Let's just say that she said 'I've never seen a number this high. Are you sure you fasted?'
Our request to form a delegation had been turned down, citing dubious rules that prohibited discussion of personnel issues. (So when and where the heck to stakeholders, voters, concerned citizens and students get to raise concerns about questionable transfers?) Clearly that’s a guideline that needs to be revised, and pronto, before any more damage is done to a fine educator’s career or reputation.
Thanks for sharing last week about vitamins, snacks and breakfast choices. Some of us are better at taking our vitamins than others - Mariska is good to take her supplement (Congratulations on the baby - how are you sleeping? *BG*) We all like different snacks but it sounds like most of us like our breakfast foods!
Unfortunately no photos allowed inside the castle!
Swedish police must "be able to use the equipment that has been acquired for large amounts," the Dagens Nyheter daily wrote in an opinion piece. "Helicopters, cars, boats and other equipment must be kept in a way so that criminals cannot sabotage them."
I can't wait to get home, and spend a few days at my cozy little place, before heading to mom & dad for Christmas.
It happened around 7:35 a.m. Thursday morning. Newport News police and animal services responded to the 600 block of 29th Street after hearing reports that a pitbull attacked a 13-year-old.
For the second time this month, the Texas Court of Criminal Appeals has told the Department of Criminal Justice and the Board of Pardons and Paroles to begin holding a lot more hearings to provide parolees due process, decisions which come with a high financial price-tag that's accounted for in neither the House nor Senate budgets.
So far I’ve managed to adjust to the Metro pretty easily, its much simpler to understand than London’s Underground as there are only 2 Transfer (Prestrup in Czech) stations on the entire network, and only 3 lines. This means that the informational design and sign-age on platforms is so simple that you often find yourself wondering if you’re heading the wrong way! Having acquired a long term pass (these weren’t advertised, but a guy from Vuste Envis called Igor hooked us up with a 3 month pass for 1510Kr, which is just over £60), we now haven’t got to worry about having pockets full of Koruna for the change machines, as this was seriously holding us up in the first day or two. The stations are much more minimalist in their design and decor when you compare them with somewhere on London’s Underground, which are often decked in elaborate illustrations. The shot below is a typical tube tunnel wall that you see from the platforms.
These were true tears and probably the first time I had 'let go' or released my emotions so readily on film. As someone who finds some emotions difficult to show, this is a special film. DO go to Northern Spanking to see it. I could not recommend a film more....
You can see the transformation in the next series of photos. These are when we went to lunch at a noodle restaurant. The first one is a family pic.These are from the restaurant. She really enjoyed it when I fed her. Again, something great and unexpected, as sometimes it is hard to get eye contact from the child or get them to smile too soon. She is a big smilie girl, and loved it when I fed her. We get constant eye contact and engagement.There is so much to say on this day, I think I will wait to continue this day at my next posting. We have all spent the night together and have had 3 meals together so far and it is amazing how well everything is going. No more crying, no bad behavior, tons of smiles and all the kids get along well (although the boys keep talking to her in English and don't understand why she is not answering them back....)
I was here for a X'mas dinner a company I'm working for.
I think that everything corporate America touches turns to crap.
Researchers note that the economic downturn contributed to this drop. But that’s not the only cause. A huge number of high-income taxpayers have simply left the state.
Even more meaningful, her daughter, Sara, gave me the keys for the key beads. I think we came full circle on this one!
Verdict: The Avengers kicks off the start to this year’s blockbuster season and has set the bar notoriously high. Fans and newcomers alike would be mad to miss out on this cinema hit and with six super heroes for the price of one there really is no reason not to go! ✭✭✭✭✭
Jesus explained to them that the very kingdom of God had come into their presence and invited people to be with him, to gather others as well. He reminded them that God brings signs of grace through the strangest people, like the cowardly Jonah and even a very rich queen.
My then "ex-girlfriend" talked to me about her new man on many occasions. It was a very difficult experience and I found myself having to play the part of the "gay friend" since she obviously only wanted me as a "friend". I learned a lot about romance from those discussions though.
TOO exhausted about things that need my brain
So, Mr. Spare the Rod and Spoil the Child, go ahead and defend it. Defend the way spanking makes your kid feel, and then justify or rationalize that against the benefits you assume spanking provides. Spend some time on your heels thinking about your choices. Select your choices after consideration and trial and error, instead of merely adopting what you have seen or the way you were raised. Prove that you have thought about your choices to the same level that you ask me to prove that I have thought about mine. Think before you act, and don't forget to feel.
As America commemorates the 10th anniversary of the terrorists attacks of September 11, 2001, the MSM is filled with stories that tell us what emotions are appropriate, while also urging us scoff at the poor, deluded “9/11 truthers” who, a decade later, still cling to preposterous theories. ‘Enough conspiracy, already!’ we’re told.
1 balancing
Finally I had to speak. “What is it with you, Shushan? Are you a gangster or what? Every time I look up there’s another literary reference fired off, another allusion … Del, an hour ago this guy was quoting La Rochefoucauld to a couple of gumshoes --”
The day started with plans of heading to London and trying to fit in both Westminster Abbey and the London Eye. We attempted to head out early so that we weren't coming home in the dark (which happens at 4pm), but still didn't manage to leave until almost 10am. It all comes down to negotiating with a small girl about what she might like to wear for the day (and not freeze to death in the process) and trying to convince a small boy that shoes are indeed necessary and that a jumper before going out isn't an unreasonable request.
I should be clear here what I mean by “anarchist principles”. The easiest way to explain anarchism is to say that it is a political movement that aims to bring about a genuinely free society – that is, one where humans only enter those kinds of relations with one another that would not have to be enforced by the constant threat of violence. History has shown that vast inequalities of wealth, institutions like slavery, debt peonage or wage labour, can only exist if backed up by armies, prisons, and police. Anarchists wish to see human relations that would not have to be backed up by armies, prisons and police. Anarchism envisions a society based on equality and solidarity, which could exist solely on the free consent of participants.
3000
I wanna dance right now We can show em how the girls get down
You’ll Never Know My Love – Edwyn Collins
And here we are a year later doing it all over again. Today’s prompt was ‘memories’ and here is my 376-worder.
The Yellow flower was made out of different little die cut flowers I had in my die flower die cut box, some of these must probably be really old too. The oval and scalloped oval was cut out using my spellbinders and xcut dies. The Sentiment is a digi that was also just lying in my sentiment digi box so please forgive me as I am not able to tell either where I got this originally from.
Let Esther know about the 30 May QMUL judging quality in disciplinary writing workshop.
Last September, JunkScience.com broke the news that EPA researchers had reported in Environmental Health Perspectives the case study of a woman who allegedly suffered atrial fibrillation after being exposed to concentrated airborne fine particulate matter (PM2.5) in an experimental setting. After disposing of the EPA’s effort to link the woman’s atrial fibrillation with her exposure to PM2.5, we commented:
Jackson L, Stewart L, Solomon S, et al. Risk of infection with hepatitis A, B or C, cytomegalovirus, varicella or measles among child care providers. Pediatr Infect Dis J 1996; 15: 584-589.
Now, the reason for all this nerdiness is because I'm in the process of making a whole new Poppet website! exciting!! It will take a while, but stay tuned....
Many people ask – what is enlightenment? Oh for an easily explained answer. The Buddha, when choosing his successor, simply held up a flower and one of his disciples was enlightened and smiled – he then became the successor. There are many stories in Zen philosophy and spirituality about enlightenment, but none of these stories actually tell you just what it is. And nor should they – it is something to be experienced, not read or talked about.
Next on our list of small towns to visit was a dual combo named Upper and Lower Slaughter. We parked in Upper Slaughter and followed a path that led through a couple of fields full of sheep to Lower Slaughter. As others passed us on the path we would stop and visit with them for short time, and surprisingly we did not meet any foreign tourists. Anyway, the cottages in these little towns were adorable, and we loved them.
Present day Tampa, The Ye Mystic Krewe of Gasparilla arrives in Tampa Bay aboard the Jose Gasparilla, a 165' pirate ship, firing off their cannons and waiving their swords in the air.
Any excess protein must be metabolised which places a burden on the kidneys to excrete excess nitrogen which can result in kidney disease. Excess protein that is not used up through exercise will result in it being stored and causing weight gain.
I believe in teaching each child to recognize their strengths, so they build a solid foundation within themselves. I provide them with the encouragement to continue building.
They loved building together and using their imaginations to create. They didn’t create just a truck or a front loader, they created a hybrid! They set up scenes and just had a blast using this set. The set includes pieces to make a 4x4 truck, a front loader, little construction signs, 2 workers and even stickers! It was a lot for a very affordable price. (They retail for $9.99 USD).
greg.mcnevin@greenpeace.org, +81 80 5416 6507
The bad guys are literally scared to death of “HIM,” or the one the Book of Enoch calls the God of gods, the King of kings, and the Lord of lords. Even the mention of HIS name sends them scurrying like the cockroaches they are.
10. I Want You (6:24)
It's when I feel the happiest as a mother.
8. Brush egg white on surface of dough.
Maranello, 1st May – After a break of over three years, Formula 1 returned to the Mugello Circuit, to be met by a large crowd – over fifteen thousand filled the paddock, the grandstands and the trackside areas, despite the less than favourable weather. Eleven teams were present for the start of the final available test session of 2012.
Half an hour and five grown-up songs (that had absolutely nothing to do with dinosaurs or Dora) later, I arrived at the airport. I was a few minutes late, so I quickly parked and trotted inside to find mum.
Okay, so......
A suggestion to overcome this fatigue is to plan a mini-lesson for about the time that those with weaker keyboarding skills begin to lose their focus...about 10 to 15 minutes into the writing process. This provides a needed break for those students and lets them regain their focus.
This is a new must make for a party.
That day I felt attractive again.
I have written my book to inform them.
Get to know your parents. You never know when they’ll be gone for good. Be nice to your siblings. They’re your best link to your past and the people most likely to stick with you in the future.
(Anwaar and Fareda exit. The servants enter.)
New Office Open House
Recently, because of things like Pinterest and Facebook parties, the daily views on my blog/website have jumped from an average of 6,000 page views a month to over 11,000 in November. I've also seen my book sales numbers growing, too. Yeah! And the best part is it's FUN for me! (Yes, I find Facebook and Twitter fun, too.) Because I like it I don't feel like I'm marketing (so much) and readers don't feel that I'm only concerned with trying to sell them something.
'Twas the Night Before Christmas ... ABC Family ... 11 AM
Source:The Conservative Voice
"Are you sure that is what the results are? Is it possible that the test is a false positive? Should I come back in for more bloodwork or do you need more samples? I can't possibly have that!"
Using a blender, puree one cup of maraschino cherries, or another type of cherries. I combined Morello cherries with maraschino cherries. Add a few tablespoons of juice to the cherries so they puree easier. Pour through a fine mesh sieve. Set aside.
"Where are we going? How are we going to get there?" came the pleas from the kids.
Frosted the top and decorated with swirls of chocolate ganache.
Imagine being told that you can sample as many desserts as you would like after you've already eaten three courses of delicious food. Do you:
Happy Birthday to me and to all the other April birthdays out there!
I am venting.
After around 2months of this thing chewing inside of me………………….
I just checked in with Krog and Draz’Zilb at Brackenwall Village, and things seem to be lining up on a couple fronts. For one, everything we learned from Skarr seems to check out. Draz’Zilb seems pretty knowledgeable on this kind of creepy black magic type stuff, and according to him it would make sense that C’thun’s chamber in Ahn’Qiraj would be an ideal place to pull off a resurrection once they have the phylactery. From what he said (if I remember this right – there was a whole lot of hocus-pocus necro-babble), since Cho’gall tried to revive C’thun in that chamber, and actually let himself become an avatar for C’thun at one point, the surrounding area should be attuned to his essence in a way that will help focus the incantation. Apparently that’s the trade-off for this kind of ritual – restoring somebody’s spirit from a non-living vessel doesn’t take a whole lot of magical energy, but it does need something attuned to that particular spirit in order to focus the spell properly, as opposed to living vessels, which I guess actually keep the essence better preserved but require an immense amount of power to unlock. So considering the Twilight ties in Silithus, this lines up pretty ideally for them.
I found these little tiny cups at the thrift store. They are very old English paste porcelain. I can't tell you how to distinguish this type of porcelain, I can only tell you that once you get a feel for how it looks and feels, you will be able to recognize it too. A lot of the old transferware pieces that I love were made this way.
The basic "how-to" is the same as the Christmas Planner. However, the tabs for these journals are as follows: Goals, Accomplishments, Adventures and Travels, Books I've Read, Favorite Scriptures and Quotes, and Blessings. As I said, I made a Teen version, too. For those tabs I used: Goals, Favorite Songs and Artists (since this changes week to week, it's fun to remember), Books I've Read, Friends Info., Travels and Adventures, and Blessings. I also dressed these up a bit more than the Christmas book by adding quotes to each title page and matting each title and quote with either one or two layers of cardstock and/or scrapbook paper.
What do kids read?
Maniacal - Frontline Assembly
John Cleese will be coming here to Norway in May to do a talk/stand up routine. Rich and I want to go, but (decent) tickets are about $130 each, and that's a bit expensive. Especially to pay this far ahead, when we have some other things coming up that we could use that money for. I'm still thinking about it, though, because it's JOHN CLEESE!
The false statistics of sexual abuse in the United States (and believe me, if you've seen a statistic on sexual violence in the American media, it's almost certainly false. This topic is so politicized as to be completely unreliable at this point) are ridiculously well publicized; but the actual genocidal horror (and yes, it is very much a part of the African and eastern European genocides, and for genocidal reasons) of sexual violence in Islam and particularly in Africa is basically unknown.
“How do you feel today John”? It took him a moment to answer and when he did it was more a mumbled assertion then and actual word. Then he bent his head again and continued writing. Dr. Logan studied the top of his head for a few minutes before picking up a sheet of paper and began reading.
9) I'm a bit of a germophobe and try to always open door handles with a tissue. Or let someone else open the door.
Kentucky HB 517 Seeks to Grant Police Powers to HSUS "Agents"
Years of hard work would pay off when he was signed on with WWE. Murdoch would burst onto the scene with his tag team partner Lance Cade and quickly won the WWE Tag Team Titles on September 5, 2005 on an episode of Raw. Cade and Murdoch would prove that they were for real when they became a three time WWE Tag Team Champions
After one of those very hectic days of driving at practically all hours, we ordered pizza. A couple of hours later, I woke up very, very sick. I had more driving to do that day, no one else on hand to do it, and here I was...well...you can imagine ...it was pretty gross. But I lived. And once again, if you hoped otherwise: Nya nya nya!!
I love the little moon poster and thought it would be great to add a little bit of pink to the girl nursery. I also found the fabric in the upper left that only hints at pink. (Can you tell we're not planning on having a princess-pink room?)
That’s not to say there weren’t plenty of opportunities to taste–we used sip sticks to taste every liquor we talked about, did a beer tasting, and the infamous 8am wine tasting:
In terms of beer, I accidently ended up with a Blue Moon, a relatively light North American beer, which I was pleasantly surprised by. It seems you should never underestimate the importance to almost shout in the barman’s ear, unless you like me are partial to a bit of variety and will quite happily drink whatever you’re given.
1/2 tbsp soy sauce
As most of my regular readers will know I’m very poorly read when it comes to poetry. Lots of reasons for this but even more excuses. Anyway a few times my friend Dave King has mentioned his fondness for the poetry of Seamus Heaney amongst others and so I thought I would give him a try. And, as I could only name one poem by him (even though I’d never read it), I thought I would start there. The only other thing about him I’d actually read was an essay talking about his Bog Poems when I was researching Milligan and Murphy:
Ha! Not everyone can watch TV for this long!
because you've forgotten why you ever came down in the first place,
Yesterday, over a month later, I received a follow-up email from corporate HR, which is located across the country. They want references and a salary expectation. Is it acceptable for me to get excited?
How fitting, then, that on the third day of the great Christmas Feast, we come also to the Feast of St John the Evangelist, whose writings extol and display the mystery we celebrate at Christmas – the Incarnation – most profoundly.
Dakhlallah will be arraigned today in 20th District Court in Dearborn Heights. He and Pet Station are charged with one count of abandonment and/or cruelty to 10 or more animals, a four-year felony.
so, in the wise words of barney stinson, i stopped being sad and became awesome instead.
REPORTER: Not.
It rambles from a hagiography and ode to Breyten's demi-god, Mandela, interspersed with bitter complaints about crime, but then in almost the same breath expresses sympathy for the perpetrators of violent crime, such as the poor, "thin like praying mantises" (sic) savages of between 9 and 15 years old who stoned to death a girl aged 11, ostensibly because she was HIV+. One wonders why Breytenbach doesn't have the same sympathy for the Skierlik shooter, Johan Nel?
So, after much deliberation, I decided to contact the publisher and was told there would be a delay. Now, to many of you, this might sound like a bad thing, but for me, it only increased my desire to work with this publisher.
went to get Colin out of his crib every morning. Opening
Although I’m friends with both types of authors, I have to say I’m a little bit of both. Depending on the length of the work that I’m writing, I can decide if I can just wing it or I need a plan.
A month or two later in 1957, Rabinowitz played Foster's demonstration record for singer Ann Cole. Ann Cole learned the song and recorded her artistic arrangement or version of it for Baton Records, under license from Dare. This record is entitled "Got My Mo-Jo Working (But It Just Won't Work On You)", and lists Foster as the author. The Ann Cole record was released, at least prior to April 20, 1957, because "Cashbox", a trade publication, on that date, refers to the Ann Cole rendition as the "Cashbox R&B Sleeper of the Week".
LÄPPLE: In those years the liturgical movement stressed the centrality of the liturgy for Christian life, and aimed to rediscover the essential elements of the liturgy, freeing them from the additions that had deposited over the centuries. Josef Pascher, the professor of Pastoral Theology, was also the director of the Georgianum, the college where the students resided, and he was an enthusiastic supporter of the liturgical movement. He had been influenced by the French currents and in the debate that then began between those who stressed in the mass the theory of the sacrifice and those instead who stressed that of the supper, Pascher was part of the latter group. Romano Guardini had, instead, already expressed himself
Now, as the youth begins a 14-year jail sentence for attempted murder, Mrs Mackay has criticised government fostering policies for putting her at risk.
You can view the entire 2009 Beer Bracket online, and if you don’t like the way our tasting tournament turned out, vote for your own top IPA: www.eveningedge.com.
Never pick at any scars that are formed by your acne. You can cause a infection, scarring, or unnecessary redness if you pick at your skin. The best advice is to consult a dermatologist for advice on safe acne treatments.
Further, within each EDRM stage there may be service sub-categories of service that should be considered. For data processing alone these sub-categories may include vendors capable of processing audio, video, social media, network file share, enterprise databases, and email and office files, backup tapes and other electronically stored files, and paper processing for example.
Only Rutland knew his sensitivity; all others found him either brilliant and witty or sullen and silent; but his heart he hid from all but his friend, and even he never knew it all. Nurtured on the French romances that were the boyhood reading of his day, he dreamed of attaining the love that he had yearned for in secret since he was pryed screaming from his nurse's arms at the age of five, and set to learning Latin with a pious young uncle. He spent his quiet hours dreaming of a romance of the sort he read about in the tales of Sir Lancelot and Prince Orlando, fated, overwhelming. She would be beautiful, graceful, a good dancer. They would make love. His imagination, always powerful, and now coupled with a teenage boy's libido, made it as real as though it had already happened. Well, almost as real.
AND/OR TWO ~ Write a letter to the Board of Directors at MSG expressing a Vote of No Confidence with regards to Dolan. That is something we can do. Inundate MSG's mail room with letters of discontentment with James Dolan's handling of MSG and the respective teams.
Obama hates truth tellers such as Julian Assange of WikiLeaks and whistleblowers like Bradley Manning who’s been held in detention for almost two years for, according to Obama, exposing state secrets aka a horrendous war crime. That is if Manning is the alleged leaker who gave the “Collateral Murder” video to WikiLeaks showing 12 civilians murdered by American soldiers. What is the difference between the “Collateral Murder” war atrocity and the 1970 My Lai Massacre and the Court-Martial of Captain Ernest L. Medina? What is the difference between the Pentagon Papers and Daniel Ellsberg and Bradley Manning? I mean isn’t this evidence we’re now living in a corporate/fascist/ military/police state?
Thy life is one of very little ease;
A group called Catholic Workers organized the rally, saying they want less money spent on war and more to help the poor.
He, too, started firing in the direction of the attackers. The shooting then settled down.
-I have lost almost 20 pounds! I participated in a local weightloss challenge and took third place and I feel so good.
It was getting onto midnight, and I was driving at break neck speed following a white line gleaming in the darkness. I was tailing a motorcycle and it left a white line from the tires running over concrete powder. There were only three problems: One, the white line was getting thinner and weaker, two, I had just stolen a police car, and; three, I was driving well above the speed limit, and I never drove a car before. All I could do was try to imitate the way cabbies drove whenever I rode them.
In the twenty-first century it is used to support honey production. In some agricultural areas of the United States, however, sweet clover is now considered a nuisance because it spreads rapidly and can take over open fields or prairies.
Details: 110 pages
For light-weight goods such as kendama and gyroscopes, ePacket is ideal, and the service, which also operates in Hong Kong, is aimed at ecommerce merchants.
523130 Commodity contracts dealers
I hope you have enjoyed my 58th installment of My Crafty Picks and have found some inspiration and/or joy!! I am sorry this one is a little short and late.....we have had one heck of a week!! My dad had open heart surgery this week. It has been a hard long week but he is doing pretty good.
“Are you hungry?” she asked but before he could answer she continued, “I’m starved. I have the same thing for my dinner every day. A McDonald’s hamburger and whole tomato.”
Overall, I will come again for Brunch or 4 P.M meals but not for dinner..
In recent years, hackathons have helped city governments across the country build new web and mobile applications. These apps provide services like a way to report potholes. Now, hackathons are being used by an even wider range of sectors that involve social good. Below are three that are leading the way.
“But mom, why?”
To search for a phrase or pattern, you must enclose it in single quotes (the apostrophe symbol). For example to search for spinning top, type
5K - 10:09 pace
136. Friendships that stand the test of time.
34 B-14 (Projected). September 11: The ABC’s of a Citizen’s Responses. (Sources: Items D-IX/12(A)/2001, D-IX/13/2001, D-IX/17/2001, D-IX/12(B)/2001, D-X/10/2001, D-XI/11/2001, D-XII/7(B)/2001, D-I/20(B)/2002, D-II/8/2002, D-III/12/2002, D-IV/25/2002, D-IV/26/2002, D-VI/1/2002, D-X/10/2002, D-II/12(B)/2003, D-IX/8/2003, D-XI/6/1977, D-IV/7/1981, D-VIII/28/1986, D-X/4/1990, D-IV/26/1991, D-XII/7/1991, D-IV/15,1995, and D-V/1/2001, below, as well as fifty-two Letters to Editors. See, for samples of these letters, Items E-V/8/1997, E-VI/0/2002, and E-Vii/4/2003, below.) This study is to be published in the Oklahoma City University Law Review (in 2004), without its previously published appendices, and thereafter, it is to be hoped, in book form. See Steve Neal’s column, Chicago Sun-Times September 10, 2003, p. 49. (The 2004 law review version is to have three appendices: Item D-IX/18/2003, BELOW, ITEM A-4, above (main text), and Item D-V/1/2002, below.)
“Any confrontation between Tehran and the Arab states,” counsels Gambrill, “should be allowed to run its course. If Assad is fated for defeat, and his fall would remove Iran from ‘Syria’s orbit’, there is no rationale for U.S. intervention.”
Her lips curved into a sexy, flirtatious smile. “Or you could stay.”
Patti Smith, one of U2's biggest influences, honors them with her piano based cover of "Until The End Of The World." Accompanied by her sons on piano and guitar, and a bass player, it's much different and more sober, and maybe more sad, than the original.
‘We are friends.’
There was something so intimate and erotic about her mouths presence on my nipple. Maybe it was their aroused state, or the very relaxed state I was in but I felt very vulnerable and very close to her as we lay there. The intimacy was amplified by my desire for her and my love for her.
Kelly calls his site The Beer Bitch, though I’d say the reviews there are very level headed and not the least bit bitchy. I particularly like the consistent rating system he uses on the blog and rather wish I had the same discipline and spine to offer more than my tepid “wouldn’t buy this one again” negative comments when I sample a stinker. Another plus is the list of reviewed beers by brewery – pretty handy and a feature I’m tempted to rip off so be forewarned and know that I told everyone I was planning to do it right here!
5. Redemption Song
He now feels the same way about Jeff Rense.
Step Six: Make sure you have a 2 by 2 inch picture of yourself for each visa application. Must be with your face in front of a white back ground and printed on photo paper.
Little bit of the insomnia tonight. Odd dream that I couldn't quite shake, revolving mostly around a conversation about baseball. Not a bad dream, but it kept whirling around the same spot. Skipping record sort of thing. I think my brain made me wake up, just to change the subject. Got up to pee, and the rest is history.
Summer Recap!
There were a lot of abstract things that I thought of when I was trying to think about my Top Four: time, energy, motivation, willingness, the list goes on and on. But, while I couldn't do any of this without time, energy, motivation and willingness, the thing that allows me to wrangle time and stay positive, is my routine. Here goes:
The dress was completely done a week ago, yet, I had to finish the detailing and made some minor changes to the neckline and sleeves. With that said, I was hand sewing up till about noon on the day of the event! I didn't feel rushed but I really wish I would get these planned event gowns or ensembles done ahead of time so I can relax. Ha. Ha, Ha!
We welcome your inspired creations:
This particular work I found in Parkdale (A west end Toronto neigbourhood) but the intersection now escapes me. The way they have used the shape of the newspaper box to create a three eyed large mouthed monster is pure genius. I wish I’d thought of it. Wait, is it too late to say I did think of this?
After a few drinks we headed back to Paddington where we got on the sleeper which looked rather romantic, sitting at the station. Until we got inside and we realised just how tiny the berths are.
Mind you, this is with Granny Smith apples. If you use a sweeter apple, instead of a tart one, this might not be the cause. Just use your tastebuds to determine it! Also, if you use a red type of apple skin, the 'water' will end up the most beautiful pink color.
And your unthought-of Harry chance to meet.
I am seriously considering electronically publishing some of my books under a pseudonym… I want to get these books out of me but to be honest when I publish more scholarly type works I am unsure if I want to my actual name to be associated with what I am going to put out! I got some stuff going on in these books I don’t know if my church family will understand! (SMH!)
So, why do the good folk of this world think that writers, singers, actors, painters, sketch-artists, magicians, even bloody mimists, will at the drop of a hat, perform freely.
I paid homage to the Northwoods by representing Oak, Maple, Birch, and Popple trees with a pressed leaf for each. Seeing as red maple leaves are my favorite, I made sure to include one on my page. I ironed the leaves in between two sheets of wax paper to keep them safe, but to also relive a favorite childhood memory of making leaf “sun catchers” with the same technique. I pasted it to the page and then set about adding a few more pieces of nature. I glued some birch bark along the upper left corner and then attached a bag of little keepsakes from a place other than the woods. The seashells and shark tooth are from the beaches of South Carolina, which always make me think of time I spent with my Dad. He’s the one who taught me how to find shark teeth in the sand and that’s always been one of my favorite memories of him.
Later this week, positive examples of the How.
Why does peanut butter make just about anything taste better?
The band was fantastic...
sea turtles whose mother stuck around, argue with me and roll their little eyes and lambast me to the point where I secretly go online and check to see if I’m mistaken – maybe there are 8 continents now. Things change – the number of planets changed recently, after all. My kids exhaust me to the point where I say “YES! There are 8 1/2 continents now – leave me alone!” Ever doubtful, they later Google the continents and declare loudly that I am, again, wrong.
A Boeing 747-400 passenger jet can hold 416 passengers. This blog was viewed about 3,300 times in 2010. That’s about 8 full 747s.
Jake- We kinda think similar, we're so muh alike
Author - Gurcharan Das
The plane has already taken off but I am unseated. The rows are full of travelers, settling in, gazing out windows, opening books, leaning back, eyes closed, to listen to iPods. I pass by them on my way to the doorway that separates coach from a part of the plane I never knew existed but enter anyway. The thrust of the plane overcomes the drag and the plane is pushed up through the bright air. I am in some type cargo space, stripped clean of carpet and seating and storage. The floor is whitewashed, with blackened steel planks, held down by rivets and antique fasteners. It is the type of place that in another time might have housed sturdy parts: landing gears, propellers, spare luggage bins, but as of now, it is empty, save for two seats that are anchored to raw metal and facing me from across a divide. They are slatted chairs like you’d find at a movie theater or a ballgame, attached at the legs and bolted to the floor with antique studs. No safety belts, just old-fashioned straps made to wind around knees and waists like a harness, clumsily buckled, like arms that are poised to grab hold. The whole thing feels like a throwback to the 40s, like some kind of old military jet, it hums with the purgatory air of a waiting room. By the force of motion, I know we’re ascending. The plane shifts then stabilizes, and I eye the two empty seats, deciding whether or not they will hold me to gravity, when I see that my two long-dead dogs, Annie and Gypsy, who are very much alive, are here, just a few steps from the sealed exit door. To see a dog in your dream symbolizes intuition, loyalty, protection, two must be doubly so. I know this as well as I know that I am dreaming. I am overjoyed to see them, but I am aware that in waking life they are still dead. I realize that they are here to tell me something I’ve forgotten, some important information that has slumbered long within me. I look out the windows of the plane to see what direction we are going in, to assess the likelihood of turbulance, to see if the plane is trailing some message, skywriting symbols that will decipher why I am here, and where I am going, and I see through the cold glass what has been there all along, the altitude of blue sky and everything beyond, and I am flying through it, carried like Dorothy hurtling toward Oz ,holding on by my feet, rooted to the unseen, to that which has come before and all that is yet to come, soaring toward the unknown without a safety net, flying far over the articulation of earth, away from the bent elbows of women squatting long over muddy water, over corrugated fences and bitter branches weighed down by leaves and birdsong, over the long slow trains that run past crumbling walls etched with graffiti, lifting over the hinge of the horizon, on my way to waking.
Look no further for fantastic book recommendations, book lists, and award nominees and winners– the Young Adult Library Services Association (YALSA) has a plethora of collection development and readers’ advisory tools, plus a number of national programming pushes and ways to involve teens, like Teen Tech Week, Teen Read Week, and the Teens Top Ten awards.
In regards to the Gospel being transmitted by a culture…
Sept 15 – Jaggard UMC – Altoona, PA (W/Valencia)
Three local schools participating worked on diverse environmental projects:
For the last two weeks, my daughter and I have been struggling to replace her stolen cell phone. I won't go into details, but it's been a nightmare, and we've both put far too many hours into the process. Not to mention the coming expense of a new phone, and our arguing over her lack of motivation to find a job. Then I discovered a couple of days ago that I had left a light on in my car before going to Trinidad. So... dead battery. I could have jumped it and let it charge, but it was in need of replacing soon anyway...
and the True Path of humans on this earth;
Twiggy remains of goldfinch nests
More about Anthony:
The grade 5 and 6 children during 2007-2009 (whose story this book is and who illustrated the book) and I shared a wonderful journey together learning English. They were passionate and wonderful students. Many of them excelled in their learning, and those who struggled, were constantly determined to keep at it. Lovely memories of the students included Zulmira, who was actually in class 4 during this time, asking me to explain the difference between the words 'table' and 'desk' - this blew me away.
Per the last blog update- Marissa had her 3rd surgery on December 17th, 2011- a procedure in which the doctors injected a strand of the common cold virus directly into the tumor, in hopes that the virus would catch, spread, and take up residence inside of her brain, thus forcing the eviction of the tumor.
and then, 16 or so years ago, the scrapbook craze hit. everyone went wild. the industry exploded. the pressure was on to create art and memories at the same time. get all your pictures in books. soon the pictures built up until i couldn't keep up with them. too much expectation. i started to write. honestly, at the time i thought it was easier. (ha ha)
Part of what makes the various tacos at Porfirio's so good is the homemade salsa. It's a very spicy green salsa, that has a distinct and lovely flavor. It's not the tomatillo based green salsa you find at most places, and I suspect it's made mostly of blended jalapenos. Unmissable.
It’s also worth noting that the excerpts afterwards were great. Both books look very promising and are definitely going on my TBR list. The first was from Rosemary O’Malley’s forthcoming novel entitled The Red King. It’s about a ruthless sort of pirate and a young almost-priest and is really tantalizing. The second was from S.A. Reid’s forthcoming novel called Soulless. It seems to be about a vampire and a man who is slightly Dr. Frankenstein and somewhat Lord Byron. The first page was a little slow, but I love the ideas behind it and the cliffhanger left me really wanting more.
I remembered that my (Middle Eastern) mother- in- law often uses " mish mish" ( dried apricots) when she cooks certain kinds of vegetables. Surprisingly, I had some . Interestingly, dried apricots do not taste real sweet after they are cooked. I figured they would liven up what seemed to me an ordinary combination of ingredients.
The pure-hearted one, having clarity of vision,
As part of each contracted package agreed and offered to authors—the company early on in the book project will offer a Marketing Planning meeting and advise the author on their publishing imprint, ISBN and cover price, putting together a press release, flyers and order forms, promotional mail shots, copyright libraries, media interviews, talking on radio, using the Internet for marketing and promotion, selling directly to bookshops and other outlets, and bookstore distribution.
That is -- I don't have it all together and I don't do it all. As a matter of fact, I'm feeling a bit listless and unfocused lately. I feel like I don't have anything to say that would interest anyone, and so my blog is giving me a little bit of anxiety.
I think the harps are, too.
Some of what you see may enlighten you, or merely plunge you into greater excesses of misinterpretation.
“If I comprehend the matter rightly, he was on his own land when we saw him.”
Here are a few highlights:
Effective March 30, 2012, I was hit by the tornado/earthquake/hurricane/tsunami of company-wide layoffs. So now I’m working on finalizing all the elements involved with the company in a company-wide layoff, dealing with unemployment, and finding a job. Sigh. . .
*Ring Toss
1 regent
Tasering the Public
Bob: Try clicking on the "refresh" button.
For the beginner I suggest purchasing a base from a craft store; that could be a birdhouse, a plaque, or anything that is of interest. This piece must be well sealed and I use acrylic paint, back and front - and it doesn't have to be perfect. Once sealed you are on your way to creating a mosaic beauty!
Law and Order SVU–but only if I get to be partners with detective Lake and my arc ends in arrest.
It was one of the most amazingly supportive, creatively intense, ideologically pure programs I've ever had the pleasure to be a part of. I got to experience firsthand some of the most exciting and powerful new voices and I know for a fact that my mentee, Sharline, made me a better writer by pushing me with her commitment to excellence (and she really was excellent).
Someone working minimum wage, or two minimum wage jobs, and trying to support a child while being taxed is going to be forced to do without something basic, and adequate food will quite likely be one of the many sacrifices. Anyone making $100,000 probably isn't going to need to skip a meal due to finances even at a higher tax rate. Depending on where they live, the yacht might have to wait, but so be it.
What was wrong with both of these examples? We did not communicate with kind and tender hearts. Anger and Pride have a way of jumping in when we are not looking. President David O. McKay said, “I’m going to tell you the most important secret of human life. The most critical need of the human soul is to be kind.”
1 green chilly
255 Grossman Dr.
You were cast off that I might draw near
But alas, via understandings and misunderstandings, Kailash comes to know that Ratan has already filled his position as husband-father in their lives. Kailash decides to not announce his presence and instead hides in the bushes, avoids Seema, and plans to leave Mumbai forever, dejected and rejected. He is especially moved by Ratan's seeming "goodness of heart": "They have a new pater familias now, and he seems like a nice guy, what do they need me for?"
I don’t know what he chooses. He’s intellectualizing his options, “braining it”, rather than choosing from his heart. Love really does conquer all. But will he choose from his heart? Does he know what he desires? Can he step out of his fear and ego programming?
Speaking of Steampunk, I strolled past the C. Koop booth and guess what? Sara's made some kick-butt charms! I saw her a few months ago and she said she wanted to see a little more color in Steampunkland, and look what she's gone and done...sensational!
I consider myself to be extremely fortunate with my career in advertising (despite my current unemployment). I've always known the positions I've held in the industry were critical for the success of the organization and the client base. If I failed to get creative materials to a media outlet in a timely manner, the advertising campaign could be jeopardized. Having been a media buyer for 12 years, I know that if I don't secure the time slots on desired networks, the commercials will not be seen. And not to strictly toot my own horn, I also know the commercials themselves have to be compelling enough to get a certain number of average television viewers to pick up the phone or go to the website and order the can't-live-life-without-it widget for $19.95 plus $7.95 shipping. If they don't, then it doesn't even matter how well I do my part. No money coming in means I don't have a job, even if I'm the best damn media buyer on the planet. So thank you creative directors and producers everywhere!
“I have my grandmother’s notes. That should be enough.”
Lemonades Cookies together in a small bowl and sprinkle on top of filled crusts.
does in this photo.
Debut novelist Lynda Mullaly Hunt creates fully realized characters, with authentic first person narrative and snappy dialog. This is not a story with easy answers. By the end, readers will celebrate Carley’s strength and growth, even as they struggle with the difficult path she has in front of her.
Captain America - 2011
So where does MLF go from here? They have some exciting partnerships on the horizon, including working with the government of Malawi on renewable energy projects, as well as partnering with an online platform, dsenyo which will allow goods to be bought and sold on a larger scale. Pretty exciting stuff!
187 2. “Law, Lawyers, and Property: The Open Society and Its Limitations.” Willamette Law Review, vol. 20, pp. 615-41 (Fall 1984). (At p. 631, l. 20, “reluctance” should read “inclination”; at p. 641, l. 7, “common” should read “common good”.) Reprinted, but without most of the notes, in George W. Carey, ed., Order, Freedom and the Polity: Critical Essays on the Open Society (Lanham, Maryland: University Press of America, 1986), pp. 35-50. (Source: Item D-IV/27/1983, below.)
There is only one thing to do. I have to change her name.
- Music – although difficult to capture in photos, the music throughout the wedding was very special. From the quartet during the ceremony, to the saxophone and piano players during the cocktail hour, to the outstanding band for the reception, the music certainly set the elegant, but fun mood we wanted.
High End Department Stores
I’ve often said that there’s one passage of Scripture that if I consistently applied it to my life—then everything about how I live would change.
back in the mid 1990's, when i was still attending the new york wholesale gift shows, a fellow jeweler friend took me down to a wonderful little shop in soho that specialized in metal trim - enormous rolls of it, like the sort you used to find on lampshades and such. i found a lovely length of silver toned trim with a pointed, crown-like design, and attached strips of it all around the front in a sort of "frame". i then glued a grid of round glass and metal tin lids with little findings behind them. finally, i hammered the words "True Colors" and the year - 2001 (that long ago?!) into two strips of brass, and wired those to the front.
mild astonishment
DBKL has prohibited Bersih from using Dataran Merdeka this Saturday. KL Mayor Tan Sri Ahmad Fuad Ismail threatened yesterday to “forcefully bar” Bersih 3.0 participants from the venue should they insist on using it for the rally.
Nights are dry half the time now that my baby is three months old. Wow! That’s not to say that she didn’t pee all night every night…it was more that whenever she awoke and I had to feed her and go to the bathroom myself — I just let her go in a potty tupperware cup while in bed or over the sink if I’m up. Anything I don’t have to scrape off her bits in the middle of the night is fine by me! Some nights were just a marathon of misses and I don’t like those at all. Since we co-sleep and breastfeed, all I have to do is sit up in the dark, let her do her business in the container, and lie back down, I can easily fall back to sleep hardly disturbed in total darkness. BLISS! It is an eye opener when a diaper change is needed. I’ve gotten good at changing a wet diaper in the dark (our 4-in-1 crib is side-carred so it hold all my supplies), but sometimes I need the light especially if there is a poo. By the time I’m done, I’m wide awake. If I’m very lucky the baby hasn’t lost her mind from being disturbed from a fumbling parent with cold hands.
Certain shops in Volos accept TEM credit. An optician accepts partial payment for glasses in her shop in TEM credit. She would later spend the credit in the farmers’ market.
Mr Smith is not a lawyer or an accountant, but as a former players’ agent and an ex Chief Executive of the SFA, one would hope that he would understand that Mr Whyte’s “control” has not been just damaged by events, but completely destroyed!
Oakley had his first day of playschool last Wednesday. I was a little nervous, seeing my little boy going off on his own ( if he could have pushed me out of the door, he would have.. good bye mom, good bye mom, when are you going mom!!). He loved it, and I love it, its two hours once a week, and Lacey is hopefully putting Will in as well, so the two of us can have some time with our little ones and actually visit!!
My hubby told me that in his out-of-the-box world, the hunky hero got cursed by an evil Voodoo priestess and only turns into a zombie sometimes.
■ For every undocumented immigrant deported from Travis County after being arrested for a serious felony, two people were deported after being arrested for some type of misdemeanor, from traffic violations to more serious offenses, such as assault or drunk driving.
You? No.
Influential Springbok Sevens playmaker Cecil Afrika is on his way home to undergo treatment on his injured right knee and will miss the Tokyo Sevens this coming weekend.
All the existing councillors were re-elected, apart from Mary Fellowes and Johnny Kramer, with Gareth Ratcliffe getting the highest number of votes.
I thought about that.
“Or what woman, having ten silver coins, if she loses one coin, does not light a lamp and sweep the house and seek diligently until she finds it? And when she has found it, she calls together her friends and neighbors, saying, ‘Rejoice with me, for I have found the coin that I had lost.’ Just so, I tell you, there is joy before the angels of God over one sinner who repents.”
Movement: Some days little Joe moves most of the day, other days he’s not as active (which always makes me worry). I realized in the middle of the night that I hadn’t felt him move in quite some time, so I touched my stomach and felt a firm area. Once I pressed on it, he moved away and then woke up and kicked me the rest of the night. Never wake a sleeping baby, yo.
Mahathir simply does not want Najib to go for a snap election because he fears Umno-BN is going to lose, on the Peninsula at least.
We're practically having a heat wave. I'm struggling to keep the water even on the plants, the large-leafed plants are expring more than they can take in, and the insects are pretty happy! These are some of the enemies I'm dealing with right now -- in a garden which is pretty much not bothered too much by pests. Either that or I'm not that observant. Leaf miners. This is why I plant nothing in the beet family for warm weather. Fortunately I'm not a big fan of chard any more, although I deeply appreciate its growth habits, so I don't miss it. Identifying the eggs and scratching them off is a good way to deal with them and helps to interrupt the generations that multiply.
7, Store in the fridge, unmould them and leave them for a couple of minutes before serving.
AllSaints Spitalfields dress, Marc by Marc Jacobs clutch, Miss Dior perfume, Chanel ‘June’ nail polish, AllSaints Spitalfields skirt, Zara heels and RayBan sunglasses.
You are a horse beaten after death
red wine vinegar
Speaking of Google controlling all, I decided to read the GoogleBooks version of '1984' for irony's sake. Bless, there are pages missing, with a rather sorry note saying such things as 'Pages 4-18 unscanned'. Well, scan them, you lazy fuckers! And yes, I know you're reading this. Although in all truth I'd just finished reading end-of-the-world miseryfest 'The Road', so took these gaps in the narrative to make up my own - much cheerier - parts of the story where Winston Smith gets a haircut, facial, and finally sees to that varicus ulcer on his leg with a bit of cheap laser surgery on the Miniluv.
Sunday, August 21 2011
For many, the idea of anti-Catholic bias is so antiquated that they aren’t impressed by this milestone. Either they don’t realize or they don’t care that the nativist riots, Know-nothing pary, burning of the Ursuline convent and “Irish Need Not Apply” are not that far in our rearview mirror. But Americans are great at re-inventing themselves, and we have reinvented ourself in this regard too. It’s OK to be an Irish Catholic now (we have other groups to hate).
“I think one of the biggest lessons we learned last year, having such a potent forward, is that no matter how much talent you have, you can never rely on one person to make or break a season,” Garcia said. “We have to play team ball.”
"You love her, you want her?!"
One of them, Bishop Fergus, attended Rome in 721 to sign decrees, presumably on his king’s behalf. This saint features both south and north of the Mounth: as patron of Glamis at the centre of cross slab carving in Forfarshire; but, as we know him, patron of Moy in Moray, St Fergus in Buchan and, most significantly, Dyce which has one of the few magnificent cross slabs in Aberdeenshire. CÈ was conservative, not pagan. The simple cross was already understood.
Rate: 6/10
Wilco - A Ghost is Born - 2004
BLDGBLOG: Finally, have you ever considered working outside the genre of critical nonfiction, and – in an almost Ridley Scott-like way – directing a film, or writing a novel?
Heyy sorry for the long blog break, but I've now handed my uni project, so time to get back to blogging again! I still need to spend the whole july in school but a little pre vacation is more than needed...
Overall the beers were well kept and enjoyable, even if not strictly my cup of tea. There was a really good mix of locals and comforts (visitors, i.e. those who comfort day) and the staff were very chatty and friendly. I would certainly recommend a visit to both these pubs if you are in the area, as they were the highlight of an otherwise uninspiring Easter day out. I really, truly, honestly, cannot recommend you go for any other reason though....
I walked in the door to find her lying on the floor looking pissed off, and may I say, quite weak. I asked "What's wrong?". She responds "I threw my back out!". I asked how and she responds with "Bending over to pet Stewie!". With my urge to laugh (a smirk on my face for sure, which she didn't like), I knew I had to take care of her the rest of the evening.
of ancient men
Asian Capitalism
Ms. Johari goes on to give a historical timeline of the amendment and how it helps women in bad marriages to get out of them. While the amendment allows a broken marriage to dissolve, if the petitioner is the wife, but not the other way around. Ms. Johari, apparently is okay if the broken marriage is allowed to continue when the petitioner is the husband and the woman does not want to end it. So basically the amendment is an affront to the basic fundamental right to equality for men and Ms. Johari fails to tackle this. Why? Because she is biased and has an agenda.
Round 3: Ch 3. 2 dc in first dc, dc in next dc. Repeat around. (27 dc) Join with sl st to top ch of ch 3.
In My Life This Week: This was a great week for me. I was feeling a little on the down side the last few weeks, but this week my spirits were lifted. I have decided to try to dive deeper into my faith this Lenten season and I can honestly say my overall feeling inside has changed. I have a sense of peace inside, which in turn as lightened my anxiety level. As I shared earlier this week, we celebrated Happy Hearts Day for Ash. This was great fun and it was really refreshing to see where she was six years ago and where she is now. It was so much fun to have family here to celebrate with us. St.Patrick's Day was filled with crafts, which turned out awesome. I guess I would wrap up our week as very fulfilling.
I think it’s clear so far I was amazed with how balanced this film was. It’s two and a half hours long but it felt shorter, it felt like it could go on forever and I would sit there ready to watch. They managed to be true to every character while showing that becoming a team wasn’t natural to them, but how when the going gets tough, the tough get going. Do I have a few critical things to say? Maybe. There were a few cheesy lines and moments, but this is a comic book movie, so I’ll give it a pass. Loki was his crazed glory, and he was a fantastic villain for this, he had such brief moments of real feeling, but he was snarky and vicious and he believed one hundred percent he was in the right. Villains often think they’re the heroes, and that came off here. He is a complex character and well portrayed. The army though, ehhhh, I know they had a limited amount of time so they couldn’t exactly give a huge history. The major villain is not Loki and he wanted the Tesseract, and he also was underestimating mankind which he admits to. We will probably hear more about this alien down the road, ahem Avengers 2, but I’ll admit there were times I was like ‘oh nameless alien army who are only there to give them more of a challenge, who are you?’ But obviously this is a small issue compared to everything else. My only tiny petty problem is why Cap was wearing that stupid mask. Everyone else is maskless and it looked absolutely horrible on him. It was frankly distracting whenever he was in the movie.
Pizza is one of the country's - and likewise, one of New York City's - most enduring and popular food items. It's a rare individual who does not like pizza, the ultimate snack or meal on the go. It's found everywhere, so the question becomes, where do I go? I have assembled a collage of six of New York City's top pizza parlors, along with two stories involving pizza which I have previously written about. Each photo links to the story and photos of that place. There are a number of highly acclaimed places in the city which I have yet to visit and write about. I will get there. In the interim, explore places you may not have yet visited and try some of NewYork City's top pizzas. Enjoy :)
Since the one setting back incident, I've been crosstying her in the pool barn (where there are concrete and enclosed wash stalls, and therefore no way to set back), and I've not had another incident of her going backwards since. We'll get back to regular crossties when I feel confident that she isn't going to shrink back away from anything that I do. Gogo was a habitual halter breaker in the crossties and while tied, so apparently I'm not the best at teaching horses to tie without fuss. But we'll see how I manage this time around.
Ginger -1/2 inch piece (Finely chopped)
40All these towns were given to the children of Merari by their families, that is, the rest of the families of the Levites; and their heritage was twelve towns.
I cut the fabric from selvage to selvage in one and a half inch strips. I then cut those strips into 7-inch lengths (though I'm thinking 8 inches might have been better). I used my rotary pinker to minimize fraying. And then I just tied and tied and tied. Then I smooshed and tied and smooshed and tied until I couldn't squeeze a single thing more on that hoop. I could have left off some of the strips but I was determined to use each and every one of them.
Today Philly, Niamh, and I watched Titanic.
Liberia ended a 14 year civil war just a few years ago. The war devastated the country. Unemployment is a staggering 85%. And even those who work do not make much. A doctor makes about 5 dollars a day. To say there is a health crisis would be an understatement. Nearly the whole population struggles with Malaria. Children under 5 have a 50/50 chance of survival. To compound health issues most Liberians do not have access to clean drinking water. Could things be worse? The answer is yes. Besides all the health problems, Liberia is a society of uneducated people. Nearly 3/4 of the children do not attend school. Spiritually Liberia has great needs. In a country where brutality has been the norm there is a great need for the peace that can only come from Christ. So that is some of the bad, but let me share some good.
9. During our three-year stint in north Florida I had heard rumor of bald eagles along the St. John’s River but I had never seen one. Osprey were well-known in the area, but I had been in the States now for eight years so it only seemed right to see the nation’s symbol. One day at church a friend who lived on the river said a pair of bald eagles had taken up residence in one of his trees. That afternoon I drove to the far extremities of Jacksonville and there they were. I watched them for an hour as they made their nest. Majestic!
** run a marathon **
I went outside and got into Stupid Peter’s car and sniffed some empty McDonald’s bags to get my taste buds working again after getting them terraformed by Mother’s dry bird. After that I found one of the children’s Heat Magazines and pulled one out over Tina from Corrie going to some X-mas do all dressed to the 9’s. When I were done I stared into the sky and resolved to get some authentic muff in 2012. Then I went back inside.
When you factor in the ownership of many regional brewers as family businesses, the future brewing operation looks even more bleak. It is no longer the done thing to hand over the business to the eldest male, heterosexual, stable, married, male child producing child. The shareholding is split between all children, then between all their children and so on. Each generation dilutes the shareholding and introduces shareholders with no interest in the business. Some may have an interest in joining the family business, others may wish to sell up, mortgage their shareholding for the capital to go do their own thing or simply secure a liveable level of dividends for a cushy life. As one generation passes to another the chances increase of a none family member taking the helm. Somebody that knows how to run a business rather than somebody that contains some of the DNA of the dead guy that started it, someone with an MBA and a CV, someone whose job it is to deliver dividends from the current business and seek new business rather than maintain what used to be the business but is now only an historical legacy of the founders. Someone who asks “why the hell are we running an expensive brewery when we make all our money out of a regional chain of restaurant pubs flogging hot diners and bottles of Pinot Grigio?”
For those fortunate enough to have outdoor space, dining al fresco is one of the great summer pleasures. If you set the table and take the meal outdoors, even a pizza can be a feast.
Some questions I ask myself when deciding what to do with a particular project:
Do you search for garden answers on the internet? In books? Or in person?
Paul said, “Be imitators of me. What you see me do, do yourselves.” Godly men and women are often the first models of godly living that a new believer has. I certainly benefited, over 30 years ago now, from men decades old in their faith. Now I hope to be the same to those younger than me. The difference for Paul to the Corinthians is that he did not derive his self-image from the attention. He was a bondservant of Jesus Christ and spent himself for the church and her people. Men and women like that are worth emulating.
I have emphasized repeatedly in some of my recent posts that no true Christian has a right to think of himself as better than anyone else, including the worst unbelievers. It is true that we have been changed into God’s special people, but the change was not the result of our own merit. It was accomplished by the Sacrifice of Christ. God has done something wonderful in taking poor, needy, helpless sinners, and making saints out of them.
Now, indulge me just a moment, here. I simply cannot help thinking that there must have been a sparkle of mischief in Jesus’s eyes when he did that. Don’t you think he might have been having just a little bit of fun, skipping along beside the two disciples on the Emmaus road (yes, I did say “skipping”), saying, “Whatcha talkin’ about?” and then just, whoosh, appearing right in the middle of the whole lot of them in Jerusalem? The probable expressions on all their faces must have been priceless. Anyway, Jesus encouraged them to touch him and see that he was real, flesh and bone. Then he asked them for some food, and ate with them. He opened their minds to understand the Scriptures about him, and promised that they would be “clothed with power from on high.” (v 49) They wall went out to Bethany together, where he ascended into heaven. Needless to say, they were filled with great joy afterward.
And now I want to answer 2 of the questions you are probably asking yourselves:
One of the biggest problems is that of burial.
First we stop pretending. Call out the hate for what it is. Resist cultural relativism and know that even in countries undergoing revolutions and uprisings, women will remain the cheapest bargaining chips…Listen to those of us fighting. Amplify the voices of the region and poke the hatred in its eye.
Then we went to the tractor pull. The tractor pull was Nolan's FAVORITE part of the fair. He thought it was hilarious when the horses would start to pull. You can't see it in this picture, but the horses were really pulling an old pick-up truck with weight in it. Horses pulling a truck? Nolan thought it was great and it kept him entertained through a whole weight class.
Dennis Etchison – The Nighthawk
Oct 22-23 – Canadian Mental Health Association – Pass Electric
Local food builds community.
For the first time in six years, the Biltmore estate is expanding the tour options for people who visit what is claimed to be America’s largest home. The Antler Hill Village visitation site, which will open in late March, will include an expo hall with exhibits, letters and other archival materials related to Edith Vanderbilt, wife of estate founder and railroad tycoon George Vanderbilt.
Right, so this particular epiphany, at 3am, April 7 two things came to me. 1st, a vision; a coherent, verbal, communicable understanding of what I envision our play on suicide is to be.
5. Paperweight 04:20
The premise is so simple it's utterly brilliant. Go to We Give Books, read a book with your kid on the site and a book is donated to a child who needs one. You even pick the place you want the book to go! The books are right there in front of you, fully illustrated, click to turn the page and when you finish a book is donated. Even without the free muffins and coffee I would be excited about this.
-You do NOT have to use Sweet 'n Sassy Stamps images to play along, but we sure love when you do :).
And keep them with me
Watching the tiger, lion, hippo and others at rest finally got to me too. I sat on a bench in shade and took a break. You know what? That was a great idea the wildlife had.
4. Damages can be recovered only for loss sustained
Rel's attempt only brought a different kind of tension, a frown exchanged for a clenched jaw as he tried not to think about what they were lying on. If they fell out of the Sherim now, they'd fall right on top of the Axtli below. But then, if they didn't, it would make its way through whatever part of the Sherim Taslin had cut across - must learn how she did that, since shortcuts were supposed to be anathema to Children of the Wild - and come upon them.
Test. Keep the machine you used in previous testing running and verify that you can reach the Internet using HTTP default (port 80). It should go through as before, in the previous gateway test. Now, configure the browser for proxy 192.168.2.99:3128 but only for HTTP protocol (remind that for content based filtering, we are not targeting to do HTTPS or other protocols). Make another access now with the browser. You should see it working as before but in the above terminal window, observing the Squid3 access log file, you should see the various HTTP access your page needs to make to get constructed. Proxy is working. Remove the proxy settings from the browser since we are targeting the transparent operation.
They all came back and said they were told by their bosses they couldn’t do it.
Well our colonies which we established last August are doing extremely well with all coming through the winter. However they have done so well that two colonies have already swarmed – which is a sign of good health and fertility. We have started a new hive with some of the bees and have placed combs with queen cells in them in a new hive. We need to leave them alone for a while, but will look at the weekennd to see how they are progressing.
Regardless of whether you’re breast or bottle feeding, chances are, your breasts will feel pretty uncomfortable, unless they’re in a properly fitted sports bra, so that’s my next point.
Will be continued…
The only organization which talks about real problems and provides effective and concrete solutions is Platform for Catalonia. We are the people and talk to people. The results of the next elections will confirm this.
Carolyn Evans Hammond
NBC’s Andrea Mitchell made what some may call a not-so-Freudian slip on her daily cable news show that broadcasts on MSNBC.
If we do not have a moment to stop and listen to one of the best musicians in the world playing the best music ever written, how many other things are we missing?
Good…is dumb.
Menma: Stay lying down and keep your face up, then you’ll be getting better soon… eh?
* Pay off visa bill completley
There the letter ended in little more than a scrawl. He was certainly describing the symptoms of belladonna and it seemed that Sestillius had been hiding a great secret; one that would shock the whole community and especially his rich companions. Having deciphered the cause of his death, we tried to gather our thoughts together when Fortunata stepped in…
Do you make the cut? Do you have any suggestions on how I can make Miss F eat her crusts?
Add 5 Tablespoons to your water when cooking a roast.
All of this may sound like a pretentious excuse, I'm not sure. Of course, I'm about to get a new smartphone. Not so old-school now am I? But without Facebook, what am I going to use it for? I suppose I'll have to download one of those games everyone is playing like Dirty Birds. Or is it Angry Birds? Maybe I am too old for this.
At the end you’ll circle back. You’ll stare at each character and try to find the mistake. The lost moment that would have held Jake’s finger from clicking send. Find the scene when the appropriate word or hug could have held this family together. Because trust me. After you read Daisy’s older point of view you’ll see that the Bergamots are an average family, and one that is completely unique, at the same time.
The first 30 minutes of the film crawls just a touch as everything is being set up, with some gunplay and carsplosions thrown in there, but once the three guys are together it's pretty much nonstop for the last hour.
Will conservatives be able to avert the crisis? I fervently hope so, but I'm not entirely optimistic. If not, how many whites will join the nazis for self-preservation? We won't know until it's too late.
Why do you do things out of character? If you do something you want to do then doesn’t it mean that that is in character? In a Facebook exchange L. McKenna Donovan called me dour:
For those who venture to the Link District, tell them Sleepless Cook N. Clean sent you, and remember—the hair on the back of my neck stands up. The President is here!
Am I the only one who thinks this is wrong? I mean, the insurance company is in the business of taking money, not giving it, right? So what possible incentive could they have to pay out money when they have the option of saying, "Nah. That's not a covered loss. Sorry."?
It'll probably be rather quiet around these parts over the next few weeks, as I have the new term to prepare for and the builders to instruct around the new flat. I'll try to keep you updated as to our progress with the latter, and will motivate myself into getting more knitting done.
dark and long
The mad dash of the day
Datuk Seri Najib Tun Razak, French Defence Minister Herve Morin, Defence Forces chief Jen Tan Sri Abdul Aziz Zainal and senior officials from both countries witnessed the ceremony.
the traffic snarls
A) We are looking into this method. However it is complicated, due to the fact that we have to limit tickets and need to facilitate a members presale. We are however hoping to be able to offer this next year.
This is the way how I cook this dish.
The question has been asked: “What is the difference between unconditional love and Sacred Love?” Within all levels of consciousness there is an accepted range of vibrational frequency patterns that you will experience, or the range of duality that has been designed for that stage of development. We call this the SPECTRUM OF LIGHT AND SHADOWS, which has a balanced frequency range running through the center. The vibrational frequencies increase with each higher sub-dimensional level you achieve. There is a range of frequencies created especially for the mental body, another range for the emotional body, and a more refined range for the etheric body that must be achieved before you may move to the next higher level. As you move into a more refined, vibrational frequency level, a fragment of your Higher Self, which is attuned to that level, will take up residency within your Soul Star. The Higher Self that has been your OverLighting influence for the last phase of experience will move into your Sacred Heart chamber and merge with your Soul Self.
Maybe I'm looking far too into it, but it seems as though the band was caught in a moment here where a fantastic track, a string of flop singles behind them, naivety, talent, (perhaps) chemicals all came to a crossroads and drove them into
Many search, but few know what to search for.
As to the rest of the world Petrucha creates, I have to say that Teddy Roosevelt was one of my favorite characters, which is the least surprising sentence I’ve ever written. I’ve always loved the boisterous hulking man and to hear him railing about corruption in the police force made me wish he could have been the commissioner in Gotham City. They wouldn’t have needed Batman. But that’s not my main point here. My main point is that the world that Petrucha built was evocative. The soot combined with the snow to make a New York City that was real in my imagination, but it went further to give the story a darker edge. It seems to me that Petrucha went through this period and picked out all of the very best things to include in this story. To think that there might have been an underground lair for a secret arm of the Pinkerton agency made me nerd out to no end. Throw Teddy Roosevelt into the mix and a plucky fourteen year old who never gives up and you have a story that will set fire to your imagination.
The day of the follow-up, I had a bit of light cramping. I figured it was just my sensitive cervix acting up after some more aggravation. I think it's tired of being messed with! Well, I woke up the following morning, 3:00am to be exact, to use the restroom and wiped what appeared to be some purple-red blood. I tried not to worry because I knew I had just had surgery the previous week and my cervix was agitated and that pesky hematoma was probably still in there causing issues.
My mind raced, remembering what we'd been told to do in this scenario. I opened up the saline line he was attached to and poured saline into him and shouted to the other nurse in the room to call a code. She got on the phone and called it while the respiratory therapist, who miraculously happened to be in the room because we'd called him because the other three patients in the room kept having respiratory alarms, and my friend Jojo, a very, very experienced dialysis nurse was also miraculously in the room. The respiratory therapist started CPR while Jojo and I set about returning his blood and disconnecting him from the dialysis machine. The crash team was there nearly instantly, along with the house doctor. They "bagged" the patient-- put a vent bag on him, continued the CPR and gave him epinephrine.
It’s fitting that Orson Welles created his great film classics in black and white. He was a master of shadows—of the human shadow. In his restored 1958 masterpiece Touch of Evil, corrupt cop Hank Quinlan is the slimy quintessence of a human soul fully immersed in that shadow. The crooked cop is aptly, succinctly summarized in the scene with Marlene Dietrich’s bordello madam:
"These things age a man, when he starts to understand the joys and sorrows of life. To find love and lose it. To meet death in its many forms. And happiness with its many faces."
Because right now, compared to some of my friends -- younger, hipper, or generally more energetic -- I feel like the biggest Grandma.
will also increase your average damage.
Noormy will come out so the boy's mother or a family representative will put the engagement ring on her finger.
Matthew Dowd
Another great thing about Toreba is that you will get to change the camera while you are playing, so that you can position the claw properly. Thus giving you the entire crane game experience from the comfort of your own home. Be sure to check out the images below to see if you are interested in any of the prizes.
6/11 Portland, OR - Bunk Bar
Starfleet sends out a warning to stay away from Earth just as our heroes are returning with the newly revived Spock to face the consequences of their actions in TSfS. Spock is not himself yet and it serves as comedic foil, but he is the one who identifies the whale song coming from the probe. Kirk suggests they travel ack in time to bring a whale into the 23rd century to answer the message. Everyone agrees that is a good idea., so they travel around the sun and arrive in 1986.
Such a lot has happened since I last spoke to you all, BarjanB Crafts opened on December 1st, with ribbons being cut by Robert Addams (papercrafts) and Monica Winfield (local Radio Celebrity) and chmpagne corks a poppin by everyone. The shop is so well stocked with all manner of crafty things to help all crafters fulfill their crafting dreams. We stock, Molly Bloom, Indigo Blu, WOW! Tando, tonic, Tim Holtz, Zutter, Creative Expression, Crafters companion, and so so much more. My new web site should be up and running in the next few weeks, so keep your eyes peeled. If you would like a list of up and coming workshops, just email me.
Not sure what stuck a spur into me this week - the derisive laughter of colleagues who've seen me work on this project on and off for two years might have had something to do with it - but I've been determined to complete the socks for his birthday on Wednesday. I'll put up full details and the annotated pattern (I had quite a few problems understanding it) on the knitting blog at a later date.
As both a Canadianan, living in New York since 1989, and a member of the creative class, I’ve absolutely felt the sting of this terrible recession. My last staff job, as a reporter for the New York Daily News, the nation’s sixth-largest paper, ended in 2006.
Well Autumn is well and truly here in South Gippsland and I might just say,has made her mark in spectacular fashion. All around there are trees changing colour, and the weather has definitely got a chill in the mornings and late afternoons. Our vegetable garden seems to be slowing down a bit, with the change in weather. Well most of it is. And that's pretty normal. But there has been a bit of a last minute rush in the tomato bed. After waiting all summer for them to get their act together and produce some bounty for us, they have finally decided that now is the time, and have well and truly made up for their tardiness.
Guitar or harp
My favorite brand are the Itoya Art Profolios. They have lots of different models for different needs. I used to get the nice ones with a clear pocket in the front, so I could have art on the cover, and it has a spot for art on the spine (bottom portfolio in the photo above). However, the edges didn't hold up after a few years, and the clear part of the cover gets scuffed and torn. Now I get the cloth-covered edges, as these wear better. For the average artist, the ones with a clear pocket are probably fine, and I miss the clear spine for labeling. But, with so many hands looking at my work, I am willing to sacrifice for the stronger edges.
-Steffi Pawloski
Following is an excerpt from a Friday sermon delivered by Sunni Islamist scholar Sheik Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi, which aired on Qatar TV on May 8, 2009:
What I want from my glossy:
Lisa Pescia (Body Chemistry)
I’m an enigma to them.”
And, on a few more repetitions, I decided that I just don't think it's a good choice for social dancing. At least, not when the voice comes in and pushes and pulls at the rhythm. It's great as art-song, but both melody and rhythm are really strong, and whatever you do, you're going to be fighting one of them. That's not a good thing on a social dancefloor. There's this beat, this melody, and the swirling walls of sensation, shutting out reality, the sense of risk and disorientation - I can just see this causing mayhem, purely by people dancing to it in ways that make perfect musical sense. It might be rather good for an exciting stage performance, I'm not sure, but when I play this and try to imagine a social dance floor as a whole, it just doesn't work for me. You may disagree, and another practice partner said he had heard it played, just not anywhere I went.
“SUARAM wants the police and the government to stop all the harassment to stop the people from practicing their fundamental liberties. SUARAM urges the government to look into the demands of the Bersih 2.0 instead of clamping down on their freedom of expression and assembly. If the Prime Minister Najib is sincere in listening to the people and practicing the slogan “People First”, then he should not curb people’s rights and freedoms.
I wanted to share a back friendly core variation that in my opinion strengthens the obliques safely and additionally adds anti rotation stability as well. Working with a ton of athletes the one thing that I’ve noticed is anti rotation and anti lateral flexion deficits seem to be high. I’m not sure why this is but there is a correlation between the body’s ability to stabilize anti rotation and reducing back pain occurrences, especially in rotational sports.
1. Combine all ingredients in a large bowl.
Lunch finished there was time to have a quick look at who was booked into our workshop that afternoon, and we were both a little nervous to see that we had a couple of people from connexions booked in. Cue much chewing of fingernails!
Dionne: Romney wants to start a war with
I nod me head. He's kind of right, I guess?
I have always loved how just prior to this part of 1 Peter he says "after you have suffered a little while."
01. Single Minded Civilian (prod. by K21)
Findings are not hard to “find” unless you drop a few of them in deep pile carpet. Findings are small elements that are needed to finish a jewelry project when creating it. It can be referred to in many forms. A finding can be a hook, a closure, a small metal detail like a protective guardian wire, among a few examples. Jewelry Findings is an old world term used to describe the components which go into the making of jewelry.
Figure out your style. Take a look in your closet and note the items you wear most frequently and why you wear those items so much. Also note your favorite items in your closet and why you liek them. Perhaps you keep a StyleDiary or post to other street fashion communities like Wardrobe Remix or Stylemob. If so, check out your outfits there. Find your favorites and take a look at what you wear. Figure out your style so you can make sure your new item fits into it.
Soooo, enough about us! Here is your May fashion guide! I really hope those of you looking at these find them helpful!! Either nobody cares or they really are working because no one ever asks us what to wear!! LOL
I turned the wall to the right of the closet and opposite the window into a little library. I like that it's a mix of low shelves that he can access as he gets bigger and some slightly higher shelves.
Sheffield fans pay their respect to her death.
-There is a deeper note to the engine noise, it sounds like a larger engine.
Stuff I want in my home (including ideal writing caves...*drool*)
Quality makeup often tends to get painful to the pocketbook, but it shows on your skin. Cheap makeup can cake or slide on your skin and isn't as likely to blend. It is more likely to sit on the surface, giving a plastic look. Look for good quality cosmetics that aren't necessarily expensive. It's better to invest in yourself by purchasing quality makeup that you know looks great with your skin type.
identify and also produce all the different intervals on the major scale. That
I left you on a sweet note in my previous post and a promise to photograph one of the 8-pound/4-kg-easter eggs that I had ordered to the office.
Blue tent upon the green carpet.
The coat of arms of Paris is here, there and everywhere, but what does it mean? The sailing vessel, an odd symbol for a landlocked city, is thought to represent the ancient Ile de la Cité, which sits like a boat in the middle of the Seine River. The city's motto, Fluctuat nec mergitur ("She is tossed by the waves, but is not sunk") is frequently seen beneath the coat of arms.
Deserves no crown
It’s ok, and actually very healthy to feel sad when someone wrongs you. The danger comes in holding grudges. Although very normal, grudges may start out small at first, but can build into something quite overwhelming and feelings of helplessness prevail.
And while I naturally knew the background of the story (as all of her many readers do!), Stephanie shares the struggles she endured and the sweetness that awaited her once the fog lifted on her journey so beautifully that I defy anyone to not be moved by her determination and spirit.
Meanwhile, they are also offering a 15% discount storewide which coincides with the National Scrapbooking Day which falls today.
So is this movie going to take the world by storm? I certainly hope so, and I think it's capable if the filmmakers play their cards right. This simultaneous premiere is a step in the right direction, a surefire way of building up hype before the official release...assuming it gets one. I heard murmurings among the crowd (unconfirmed murmurings, mind you) that different premiere cities were playing slightly different edits of the film in order to judge which version garners the best viewer reaction. If, on the off chance that this proves to be true, it should be noted that I caught the Wichita, KS showing.
The last time I was in there, some dude came in from the street and fucking ATOMIC BOMBED the bathroom with such a rancid pile of steaming shit that I could not tolerate being inside the 'mat, and was forced to sit outside playing Tetris on my phone instead of Galaga!
Hello! Thank goodness it is FRIDAY!! :) I have a fun little card for you today! I just LOVE this adorable little puppy image from the Dog Sympathy set form Our Daily Bread Designs! Here I have colored the image with copics and paired it with some Basic Grey Max ans Whiskers DP. To finish off the card, I added some satin double sided ribbon from the Really Resonable Ribbon Store, and crystal brads from Zva Creative!
It was broadcast in Mandarin on Astro AEC, with a simultaneous translation in Bahasa Malaysia on Astro Awani, and aired over the Star’s 988FM.
And then we have its unemployed cousin who rents a room in the basement...
3You have now been with your brothers for a long time; till this day you have been doing the orders of the Lord your God.
Oh and as an extra thank you Shabby Apple is offering a 10% discount to all of you lovely readers! The coupon code you need for this special discount is "seamstress10off". Why not pick up a lovely dress to go with this lovely necklace? The "I'm Late! I'm Late!" navy Lace dress is definitely my pick to pair with the Through the Looking Glass necklace. The discount code will only be available until the end of February so make sure to take advantage of it right now!
“For me, socialism represents moral value – the dignity and human rights of all citizens,” she told the San Francisco Chronicle in 2005. “That is, the resources of a society should be shared and the wealth redistributed as widely as possible.”
While I'm tinkering in the kitchen today with that cake recipe, I will steer your attention to Ghetto Hikes, one of my fave 'new blog' discovery of this year.
This is internet. This is how my short discovery just happened:
What Not to Wear
When friends go to such trouble for you and manage to make you laugh like that, it is hard not to feel pretty good and forget the complaints about how you could have been a contender. Maybe I am where I ought to be, and not so far off of who I am supposed to be.
The biggest problem you will face when it comes to living alone is able to afford it. Cost of living alone is quite a bit higher than the cost of sharing a place. Not only will you have to pay more rent if you are the only living there you will also have to cover all other bills. You could barely pay your bills when you live with someone else then there is a pretty good chance that you can not afford to live alone.
Sunday has been a nice and quiet day. Perhaps Tim decided that I needed another quiet day, perhaps he needed one too. Who can tell what runs through the thoughts of man?
Oprah poured millions of dollars into her ‘miracle program’. Within a year she quietly shut-down the program. Not one of her ‘hand-picked miracles’ evolved into anything remotely resembling a responsible human being. In fact, Oprah’s volunteers scurried off like a pack of well-fed rats – with so much as a “thank you sister Oprah for proving how stupid you are
The kitchen is the center of the home. It is a place to gather and share with family and friends. It is also one of the most popular rooms in the house to remodel. Whether you wish to incorporate the latest trends, modernize, totally redo or just update your existing kitchen, you don’t have to break the bank.
Nothing will flow and nothing can fall.
Let me look into your eyes and see
Sam Harris, in ‘Letter to a Christian Nation’, points out that if the bible got the easiest moral question that humanity has ever faced, wrong, slavery. What are the odds that the bible got something as complicated as human sexuality wrong. One hundred percent.
White heat, aww white heat it tickle me down to my toes
‘That’s great, thanks,’ she says.
The things going on at Penn State are insane. The allegations against one of their former heroes is sickening and if they are true, he deserves to spend the rest of his life in jail where he can be sodomized by Bubba or Frank in the local cell block shower. The supposed cover up of the whole situation is incredibly disheartening and proves how you shouldn’t hold athletes and sports professionals on a pedestal. They are human and fallible. This is proof of that.
doubting
1 teaspoon red pepper flakes
Vicki B. Fabuloso
2.YOU'RE TRUSTWORTHY. When others trust a child, the child will trust himself.
05-20 Melbourne, Australia – Rod Laver Arena *
Up until a few years ago, the list of foods I loathed was a long one. It included, but wasn’t limited to: spaghetti squash, broccoli, asparagus, red cabbage, ginger ale, cauliflower, radishes, lentils, beans, Brussels sprouts, fennel, eggplant, anise, scallops, figs, and of course, the dreaded mayonnaise. The list goes on (and on), but you get the idea: growing up, I wasn’t exactly a daring eater.
One more consideration: the method used to detect this specific extrasolar planet - "radial velocity" - can only tell us its minimum possible mass, not its actual mass. Radial velocity is based on the planet gravitationally tugging on its parent star, and we observe the doppler shifts of the star only along our line of sight. In other words, we only see the parent star's movement towards us or away from us. Given the specific amount of doppler shift that we observe, if the planet's orbit were oriented edge-on to our line of sight (i.e. a 90-degree inclination), then its mass should be three times that of Earth. If, however, the orbit's orientation is closer to face-on (i.e. a zero-degree inclination), then most of the tugging would be in the "plane of the sky", with only a small percentage being the to-and-fro motion we observe with doppler shifts. In this case, the total amount of tugging is quite a bit more than what we can observe in the doppler shifts, meaning the planet's mass would be substantially larger than three Earth-masses. (Non-trivial problem for the math-heads out there: find the expectation value of the inclination of a random planet's orbit. It's a neat answer.)
Patton and Pegg have supporting roles, she as sex appeal and he as comedy relief and both perform ably. Patton in particular really isn’t given a lot to work with and that may leave some cold when it comes to her character, but she is sexy when she needs to be and an action heroine when she needs to be.
This post is part of the Animation Wednesday series, a regular column which looks at animated TV series and movies of the past, present and future.
that sort of lost sight of that fact.
“We can work together here on Capitol Hill to forge an agreement and I’m hopeful the president will work with us,” Boehner said.
communication open.
Next highlight on Ady's weekend was Pinkalicious The Musical. Also right by our hotel, Ady loved it, Eric slept and we got autographs from the cast afterwards.
1- There not a single bullet fired in this staged celebration!! because it was in Qatar.
We drilled the holes in the center of the end pieces, but you may want to adjust the location of the holes depending on the finding you use.
Once again, my sincere apologies to William Skidelsky, and my thanks to him for pointing out my error and enabling me to put it right.
Shoes have been cleaned and tidied and everything in the wardrobe is shipshape. Now there are just eight drawers of T shirts, blouses, jumpers, cardigans etc. to go! But not today. Enough is enough for one day.
The ingredients are super simple and the whole thing only takes about 20 minutes to make. Have fun !
“Sub human creature, I am Xanther from the Planet Mugathra! All humans will be enslaved!”
Snacks like crisps
If you think these guys are goofy, just put a little though into it. These are extremely fast creatures, up to 3 metres tall (10 feet). The smallest of the species was about 1 metre (a little over 3 feet). They're basically like ostriches. You know how scary ostriches can be? Well, imagine if they actually wanted to eat you.
One of the most neglectful aspects of this tosh so far as been to fail to cover one of the more exciting cooking lagers available to the British cooking lager enthusiast and this weekend I bought a big box of it to compensate for my neglect. It is currently difficult to ascertain whether permanent inflation has hit the cooking lager market bumping up the prices of lovely grog or whether we are stuck in the wilderness between Christmas and Easter waiting for the next 3 for £20 offer on big boxes of cheap lout.
Recipes for buttercream usually call for "softened" butter, or "butter at room temperature". More recently, I've noticed that recipes are getting more specific and list "butter, at cool room temperature" or "butter, softened but still cool". Confused yet?
Then a hope will be around,
10. Bring You Joy (White, Argent) 4:12
It is beyond belief that so many fail to see through the dishonesty and basic madness of this argument. This strategy depends on an ever increasing number immigrants providing for an ever increasing number of immigrant pensioners. Very much like the health service, where we are told we need to strip the third world of qualified medical staff in order to cope with the strain caused by ever increasing numbers of third world immigrants.
Today I tried a new muffin recipe, which I adapted from a Jessica Seinfeld recipe. I thought since it had a lot of natural peanut butter, whole wheat flour, and mashed banana it was a fairly healthy recipe. That part of the recipe was pretty healthy as it turned out, it was the brown sugar that made this less healthy. Don't get me wrong; sugar is natural, and I'd much rather use a natural thing than a chemical sweetener (Splenda, equal, etc). The problem is what it does to my blood sugar levels. I thought of replacing some of the sugar with honey, but there weren't really any other liquids to reduce and make up for the added liquid of honey vs. sugar. Then, I wondered about replacing some sugar with unsweetened applesauce, but again your running into the problem of too much liquid. In the end, I just used the brown sugar and vowed to only eat one muffin for breakfast and have an egg or some other protein to balance it out...which is probably what I should normally do anyway. Usually, I convince myself that two muffins and coffee would make a great breakfast...and it does taste great. Now, that I have to watch my sugar intake, I need to rethink some things. Just out of curiosity, I plugged the recipe in to myfitnesspal to figure out what was in each muffin. Here are the results. Each muffin contains lots of protein, fiber, and sugar... 242 calories, 33 carbs, 10 fat, 7 protein, 20 sugar (16 from brown sugar), and 3 fiber.
A rather sad and human tale of how industry tramples on the hopes and dreams of individuals while it promises a golden future for everyone - a dream rarely realised.
the black
3. THAT friend just gets your girlfriend into trouble a lot:
One of my big concerns prior to having Kalia was breastfeeding. I really really wanted to be successful at it, and was worried that I might not be. Well, Kalia is already taking after her Mommy and Daddy in that aspect and is quite the over-achiever. She feeds about every hour to hour and a half, which doesn't leave me much time to get any sort of restful sleep at all. Which means I'm a zombie all day / all night long.
It's been a year since I was back in my hometown, so Melbournians I ask, what have I been missing? I'll have a few days free and would love to know any new cafes/shops/exhibitions I have to check out.
First, the cost of downloading an article has never been lower than it is today — on average one fifth of what it was just 10 years ago. As the effective price paid per journal accessed has decreased, the number of journals accessed has increased, and the usage of those journals has grown by over 20% per year. We have invested heavily in making our content more discoverable and more accessible to end-users and to enable the research community to develop innovative research applications. Perhaps it shouldn’t be a surprise that in a study published by the Publishing Research Consortium, which Elsevier’s research team help conduct, 93% of university researchers report that access to journal articles is “fairly easy or very easy.” The full report is available here.
Green Chilli : 1-2 Chopped
Wishing everyone much joy and love!
'There are eight of these two headed snakes in the world, albino and normal. But this is the only snake which is both two headed and albino,' he said.
I am in Love...oh yes I am...and I want the Whole World to Know his name
One of my dearest friends has had a difficult year. She’s had one virus and infection after another — so many that she’s lost 30 pounds! And, she was recently diagnosed with an ailment that promises plenty of pain and some lifestyle changes.
(photo by the talented Nicole Koch)
Which series should get a follow-up?
So the Italian Exception isn't so much that Italians are really accepting so much as they are much more local and perhaps open-minded in their point of reference for prejudice.
So I've got a new strategy...oops, sorry, it's not a strategy...that died...it's a...a "conversation" or a "shared value" or something...
There is confiscated marijuana, heroine and cocaine, too, some aging for decades on shelves.
Being a real KU football fan is new to me this year. I never bothered with it outside of a passing interest, to keep me busy until basketball season, so I have to say that I am blown away by the combined effort they made this year. I hope this means wonderful things for the future. And to the Mizzou fans - be thankful. Your quarterback rocks, this is your winningest season, I think, ever. Good luck meeting the Sooners.
The Communist State that existed within the geographical location known as Poland between the end of the Second World War and 1989 (although not officially vanquished until the short constitution of 1992) was from the very outset an unconstitutional abhorrence placed on top of the existing democratic Poland by external agents (whist it obviously had many Polish supporter it could not have been created without the USSR). Therefore to declare one of its acts as unconstitutional is strange. Whether martial law agreed with or did not agree with the PRL's constitution does not change one iota the unethical nature of the act.
After duck diving the next 15 waves and getting pushed further and further down the reef, it was over.
Stamp Set - I used It's A Loop Thing
Winners will be drawn and posted September 27th! ***
Garlicky nut coated spaghetti and cumin treated salmon.
I like the reviews at Fun Educational Apps. The site is easy to navigate using the search tool that's available on the front page, or by clicking on age-level tabs near the top of the front page.
Our silent couple sits on a bench, basking in the glow of their mutual feelings. They are hungry so Yi Gak suggests that they have some of her special omurice. I know that it’s supposedly cute and romantic for your man to be addicted to your food but cooking is work. So he gets to sit back and enjoy his meal while I have to slave in the kitchen? I don’t think so.
Before we begin this little tutorial, I must first thank Mariah who hosts the Crazy About Pincushions Yahoo group. Thank you, Mariah, for such a great group!! I have had so much fun since I joined sometime in 2008. I've participated in several swaps and have some lovely pincushions that I've received from members. The recent swap with a Strawberry theme really got me inspired. I love strawberries and can recall my Grandma Goldie picking strawberries in her garden. I tried growing strawberries but the birds enjoyed them before they ever got to my kitchen. Anyway............ Luann, one of the group moderators, came up with the idea for the Strawberry themed swap. Then Mariah posted a picture of a cone-shaped pincushion in a pretty strawberry print fabric with a beautiful bow. Something about it reminded me of an apple pincushion that my Aunt Marie made many years ago. I thought....what if I made a plump strawberry pincushion? And so I did! My first one was a little too long, not plump enough, so I made another one to send to my swap partner, Patti. She loved it. I thought ..... hmmmm......I should do a tutorial on this as it was fun and easy to do. So that's how this came to be. And now you can make one, too.
It's a salad, you know how to assemble!
Last year, Moldova provided such an entry. Their bizarre interpretation of pop-punk involved gravity defying hats and unicycle riding, for seemingly no other reason than why not?! Top this off with some questionable lyrical turns: A tug/She pulls me like a drug/I want her on the rug/But she’s not that kind of girl, and they managed a very respectable 12th place with 97 points.
The frame is cut from Elegant Edges Cricut cartridge. And the cute little cowboy is cut from A Childs Year cartridge, the design on him is part of the paper design. I used the shadow feature so the little cowboy stands out from the background paper. I also used pop dots so raise him up and give him some dimension. I used a white gel pen to add the white "stitching" around the edges.
Fatehabad was the hub of the Mughal Empire when it was occupied. And for Emperor Akbar, it was a place to showcase his ideals, his views and his vision for the Empire. But not for long. Trouble was brewing in the Northwestern parts, and severe water scarcity in Fatehabad added to his troubles. So by 1585, Akbar shifted his capital to Lahore with an eye to quell trouble from the Northwest. Though the seat of the Mughal Empire shifted back to Agra in 1598, Akbar never returned to Fatehabad again. Neither did his descendents, except perhaps to offer prayers at the dargah of Salim Chishti.
I tried to sound like the confident maternal type.
3. Woo hoo, show us your knickers *snigger snigger*.
Money! It makes the world go round, well, that and gravity. Probably more of the gravity than the money…
ePacket affords peace of mind for small packages and is much less fraught with risk of non-arrival or loss as normal airmail.
“It Must’ve Been Ol’ Santa Claus” by Harry Connick, Jr. (from, When My Heart Finds Christmas,1993)
“There are some signs of this whimsical theory of Evolution soon taking another phase. Carl Vogt has given hints that perhaps they have, after all, made a mistake as to the line of descent. It may be found, he conjectures, that Man is not descended from the Ape family but from the Dog!
The elements – Arsenic (As), Potassium (K), Manganese (Mn) , Sodium (Na), and Zinc (Zn), are specially noted since these can be harmful or can be essential to the human body.
Much of what she saw delighted her: the manners of school children and their love of learning, the independence of American women and the loyalty and support they enjoyed from their husbands, and the can-do spirit that we still today think of as particularly American. And then there were the things that saddened her (treatment of Native Americans), frustrated her (no wine with dinner!), and yes, even grossed her out (public spitting and nose picking, which she mentions more than once). At the end of her journey, she is looking forward to returning home to France but full of regret at leaving a place she has learned to love.
First Irene would be interviewed on the press articles that appeared in the local dailies on May 8th, 2012; then she would be required to lodge a report with the MACC; following which she will be questioned by the MACC on that report without the presence of her lawyer. If the lawyer insisted on being present, the lawyer will then be asked to sign a ‘witness statement’.
-All candidates shall write their proposals on a legal pad and deliver this information to potential voters personally. Photocopies are acceptable, but the photocopies must be made by the candidate and certified by affidavit.
No doubt that will be Dick Cheney’s lasting impression, a low-key amiable man. Stuart Stevens, the oracle of Delphi.
(1) Women don’t work as hard.
children's books from the participating authors
This introduced species was brought over to North America as an ornamental by immigrants from Europe, and is commonly cultivated. It is now found wild in every state except Alaska, and is also found in most of Canada.
Instead, a good counselor will help you learn to understand and appreciate who you are, as well as helping you to understand all of the options available to you. Transgender counselors should offer couples and family counseling, too, in order to help everyone around you learn to accept you and deal with the issues that are bound to arise.
1 1/2 cups cocoa powder (For vanilla cookies, I left this out and subbed it with almond meal that I get from Trader Joe’s. You could also use the almond meal from making almond milk!)
stubbed toe. You get the idea: first everything.
Nicole Mitchell, contralto, singing songs of the 19th century
( ) launch your own investigation to gather more information and to avoid wasting the Company's time.
Meet the brewer (every Tuesday)
Since the airline tickets student discount but acknowledge they have paid to be reached in the tokyo airline tickets student discount is to protect and secure cameras, lenses, memory disks, flash units, etc. some photographers prefer to insert their well organized camera bag may be very reasonable. Try booking on-line to see their loved ones.
Obviously any new development requires some resourcing, even one as minimal as this. But cost is a poor excuse for doing nothing. It does not cost much to post a file to a blog -- as PatLit and the IPKat demonstrate. Charged appropriately, it could even cover its own costs. It is exactly the sort of project that an institute like IBIL might take on as a pilot scheme. With the arrival of an advocate for open justice like Sir Robin Jacob, fresh from the Patents Court and Court of Appeal, IBIL would in fact be the perfect vehicle for demonstrating a UK pilot scheme of open justice on the web.
An important social issue, for sure. But far from the immediate potentially life-threatening issues of nuclear-capable North Korean defiance, demonstrated and unreported economic slowdown, new CFPB rules that could help us hang on to our homes, the threat of an impending explosion to our already-suffering economy…and the list on goes on – for just that week alone.
Look at the gorgeous samples made by the team if you need some inspiration. You can join in until May 16th by linking your creation at the blue frog at the bottom of this post. Make sure you have read the guidelines before you enter your project because if it is not made according to these your entry will be deleted without warning. The winner will win a very cute prize
Caroline Norton
30 Shoulder Squat + Drop + Push up and Jump
Poor me though. I’ll never see anywhere close to the $12 million Albert’s getting this year. And I can only hope that my average doesn’t crater and I end up hitting lower than the Mendoza line for the third straight year. But what the Pujol’s story demonstrates is that this year’s Major League Baseball season has been impossible to predict. Washington Nationals in first place as we enter May? I rest my case.
In subsequent posts, I’ll discover those with you, and we’ll see where these signposts lead me…
(Hey!)
Beside these marvelous resorts the name comes that can never be ignored is Solluna Resort In Corbett, Wild Trail Resort In Corbett, Tarika Resort In Corbett, Corbett Escape Resort In Corbett, Wood Castle Resort In Corbett, Manu Maharani Resort In Corbett infect Manu Maharani is one of the best resort in Corbett.
People in all their vanity and vulnerability present themselves to us day after day, hoping only to be heard--talking about their day-to-day lives in ever so many different ways and forms. Sometimes we keep it superficial and other times in the quiet and dark of a moment we tell you who we are. Who we really are deep in our innermost selves of self.
A third passport went to Damien Stanley, who had been found with bomb-making equipment in England. Mr Stanley travelled to the United States on his passport.
Yesterday we girded up our loins, pulled on our walking shoes, and trotted off with the walking group. Everyone but us has bought a shirt in red and white with the appropriate logo in the appropriate place, but when one has lots of bright coloured tee shirts why not wear them? Especially when one does not look at all good in white. Wearing those dazzlingly glaring white shoes is enough for me. It was really hard work yesterday too, for some reason I didn't feel quite 100%. Perhaps 85%. After walking for 45 minutes it was more like 53%. Back up to 99% today. Walking is supposed to be very good exercise but I don't enjoy it.....all I can think of after we finish is "that's an hour of my life I can never get back"......it's like taking nasty-tasting medicine, we know it's probably doing us good but that doesn't mean we have to like it. Once a week is more than enough for me.
Oh, and he was the goalie on Wayne Gretzky's Pee-Wee team.
- mix with a wooden spoon until it is a smooth, thick batter
Sorry I didn’t post again last night. We got back a little later than expected and I was exhausted! So let me tell you a little about my day. I watched Howie till the afternoon. Then my friend Laurie (the girl I’m moving in with this August) came over and we caught up. Since I haven’t been home since March I really missed shopping, so we decided to go to Target! One of my favorite stores! I bought a few things that I wanted and only one that I needed. ha. Figures.
So I’ve had this custom Starbucks tumbler for over a year now and I hadn’t done anything with it. I’d tried cross stitching an insert (which I can only find my 2/3 completed picture here) but it ended up being too thick to insert. So I’ve just left the blank black one in my tumbler for like 9 months. I’ve started using it again so I finally decided to just make something, but I wasn’t sure what I wanted to put on it.
These aren't a practical every day option for the Utah beer lover. Unless you have an iron pallet. The high tartness and acidity will wear on the stoutest of tongues, but when your in need of beer that's full on flavor, that won't shit all over your diet, you have a friend in the "Brett based beer".
The Unions are approaching BELL Telephone like Monopolies of interest, and perhaps a little anti-TRUST legal investigations should begin.
Me: Sweet P leave the lock alone (she unlocks it and the door starts to open). Arghh. (I pull the door shut and relock it--yep, pants around my ankles, baby in Ergo).
(Strangely, I had just yesterday slated Ingrid Pitt to be the Terror Titans Saturday Scream Queen selection for December 4. This isn't the sort of period I like putting at the end of those entries.)
Stephanie and I had been working all morning inseparate rooms in our house. She was cloistered upstairs in our office toiling on some year-end reportsgoing to the numerous officials in the states we are distributed in. I was downstairs answering the one hundred and seven emails I had let pile up during the week between Christmas and New Year’s.
Although only a little bit. I've finally gotten fed up enough with the post-two-babies wubby (that's a real word) belly to commit to getting rid of it. I've been trying to introduce more vegetarian meals to the family anyway, and I've never really been a meat person. Hold in your dirty jokes. I don't really go for steak or pork or even chicken that much anymore, but I cannot be a normal functioning member of society that doesn't routinely stab people without chocolate. Cue all the amazing vegan blogs out there that have dessert recipes without added sugar and some even include vegetables. THANK YOU INTERNET.
You might have redundant stock, but people coming in that aren’t professionals, will find what they need according to the project they are doing. Which I am sure is the design home depot took in their mega stores. To make it easier for the common person.
Now the pepper plants are at the correct size for what they should be right now. I should be able to get them into the ground right around the correct time. The photo above shows the plants from the old seeds and the heirlooms. The flat of new seeds are having a really hard time sprouting. In fact, I put the cover back on them tonight. I don’t think they have gotten warm enough to open the seeds yet.
The top 10 candidates from each of the Nordic countries have been announced.
Taking my partner in crime with me tomorrow so we can score some fabo deals hopefully before anyone one else spots them and buys them out from underneath us.
It was probably the coldest day we've had so far this year in South Florida and it was slightly overcast which probably was what kept the crowds at bay so our kids could freely jump with practically no wait from one ride to another.
5 patent
My own view is that such an attack is an extremely remote possibility since it must still come from a nation-state and would easily be detected. This would ensure that the perpetrating country would be nothing but a cinder by the next day. Rather, I think the greater danger is the Sun, a body which is totally indifferent to notions of deterrence, but whose fury could be addressed through the hardening of our many vulnerable systems.
I was flicking through my ipod tonight and thought I'd pick out a few tunes for a blog entry and tell you some of the memories and stories that go with them...
The school from the outside looked beautiful!
AiRDATE… : Apr-21-2012
Obviously good in any bartering situation, but this generally also works quite well as a confusion tactic when someone asks to you to do anything.
We strive for BALANCE in our work, and of course, your wish is our ultimate goal. Some people barely wear any makeup on daily basis so we put lighter base and powder (even though they will think they have a lot on! :DD) because we want them to feel comfortable on their important moments. Other people wear more makeup on daily basis so we're more adventurous in our approach with their grooming.
How long before they ask your political persuasion or if you support Obama.
You keep 100% of the profit
all I want is someone to take care of me when Im sick. I've spent my whole life taking care of other people...especially when they"re sick. I just want someone to make me some tea and toast and fluff my pillows...and ask me how I'm doing.....maybe make me some soup?
Spirogyra are a British folk/prog band that recorded three albums between 1971 and 1973. Their final album, Bells, Boots and Shambles, appeared on Polydor in April 1973 and sold very poorly. The album was a highly stylized mix of psychedelic, flowery-folk/contrasted with some harsh socio-political overtones- and many dubbed post-production sound effects, most tracks blending into the next one.
Sangameswaram :
Salt/pepper to taste
‘Always Loved A Film’ is another pop orientated track that the Deadmau5 brigade would recognise. The bass on the 8th’s with the lead and melody side-chained to give that noticeable ducking/pumped sound made famous by Mr. Zimmerman. D Ramierz can be heard all over this track, the veteran house producer is a dab hand at creating fantastic melodies that are at home in most pop music and this is all at show here. It really is a radio friendly song that one wonders why it hasn’t been played more!
Oh? Well. Maybe. Just this once. Oh, all right. Will you stay for lunch and help me practice the Japanese tea ceremony? Is there gold at the end of the rainbow?
Why don’t you let me see
Gehry said that the site "would use a variety of materials so they don’t look like they've all been done by one person, they don't look like a project, they look like they grew over time. Then the public spaces, how to orchestrate those. And then the issue of--an arena needs bells and whistles and whoop-de-do, and then you are in a residential district and how do you orchestrate that so that the people in those apartments that we're going to build aren't plagued? If a guy comes home from work and wants to cool out, he's not barraged with imagery and bright lights. And so there's a whole bunch of sensitivities. How do you do that, how do you make it come alive for the game and solve the problem of identity for this basketball team and I hope someday a hockey team." (The Toronto-reared Gehry’s a hockey fan.)
but she did send me a
The giraffe, the meercats, the pig and the kipper.
Please send me links to the holiday giving campaigns that catch your eye for their irreverence, accuracy, engagement, irony, or humor. The ones that excel in shtick, make you laugh, and make you violate your own rule about not passing on chain emails. Submit them in the comments only and include videos and other links so we can all enjoy. The Chronicle of Philanthropy recently ran this story on shocking fundraising campaigns - I'm looking less for shock and more for shlock.
Television and film still have a ways to go on dealing with our changing society but it is good to see efforts being made to show Mixed couples in everyday relationships.
Please share whatever you see with me, I’m interested to know what others do or, perhaps don’t, as some have said, “I can’t see anything,” or “it just looks like the flash was too bright, that’s all I see.”
The very best and most simple way to protect yourself is to push all negativity away from yourself; in short, get yourself into a calm and somewhat peaceful state. Next, say a prayer or call upon God, Christ, Angels, Spirit Guides, or whatever symbolizes for you a powerful Force of Goodness (Light), and ask for that presence within and around you. Such a call is ALWAYS answered!
Now, in the midst of this debate, there are some who want to return to the same practices that got us into this mess. They want massive bailouts, slaps on the wrist for corrupt financial institutions, lobbyists visiting the White House to write bills. They want endless, expensive wars, treaties that ship jobs oversees. They want an ever-rising flood of corporate money influencing politics. These aren’t Democratic values or Republican values. We’re both in this scam together.
He doesn't sleep through the night yet, and part of me is glad - that's part of continuing the lacational amenorreah I'm enjoying right now. The other part of me is tired, but not as tired as you might think. I wish I could go back to the time right after Roo was born and tell myself all the tricks!
The good news is that you don’t have to eat all the essential amino acids in every meal. As long as you have a variety of protein sources throughout the day, your body will grab what it needs from each meal.
The next evening, a 77 year old man in Salt Lake said, “It’s being quite jarring, this retirement thing.” Come June, he is stepping away from his profession of 55 years. “I’m finding that I must work in ways I never anticipated to find out who I am now.”
Michigan-born Richard Christian Nelson did not begin painting until the age of 25. Before embarking on a career in the visual arts, he had been enjoying success as a rock musician performing in Michigan and New Jersey, but was afraid that the music industry might not be a long-term, stable job option. Instead, Nelson, who had always loved to draw, enrolled in art school, and became immediately hooked.
A new treatment for PE's is causing a stir in the medical community. It seems a catheter system that injects medication while stimulating a clot with ultrasound waves has proven very effective in treating this potentially life threatening condition.
"I've converted it into a fridge, that's an Intel Core i7, and I'm overclocking it big style".
Still, there is more. While appearing on Huckabee, General Jack Keane (Retired), the former Vice Chief of Staff of the Army, told Mike Huckabee that Obama knew where Bin Laden was hiding out since the summer of 2010 but wanted absolute proof. That long time period that he waited could have given Bin Laden the chance to escape if he felt that his whereabouts were known by the United States.
If home is not considered a place of safety, you will both be tempted to seek it somewhere else. Perhaps you might look to another person, initiating a relationship that either flirts with adultery or actually enters in. You may look for comfort in work or in outside hobbies, something that partially shields you from intimacy but also keeps you around people who respect and accept you.
Again weasel Sandra Fluke wants to have sex with various Partners and we pay. The Liberals use that word “Partner” and we will use that as who knows who or what Sandra Fluke is sleeping with. We really don’t want to know which partners are “double bagging” with Fluke, we just don’t want to pay for it.
I also made some little pennants for the decorative branches using again some scrap papers, Twinery twine, circle punch, and stickers.
B1G1 FREE – Eclipse Bottles, Up To $3.99, Manufacturer Coupon
This happened because 40% of workers needed to harvest Georgia’s crops in the last year were not there to do the work. The accustomed agricultural pickers did not show up because they were not hired because of bad law, or the workes were afraid of the consequences of showing up and risking deportation.
Hello everyone and welcome to our Seventh challenge here at Hookedoncraft and thanks to all who entered our Sixth challenge.
Poopy (which he will now say during diaper changes, ha ha)
These photos were taken at a Dominican Rite Low Mass celebrated by the American Dominican Fr. Pius Pietrzyk, O.P., a priest of the St. Joseph Province in the chapel of St. Pius V at Santa Maria Maggiore, Rome, on the saint's feast. His intention was an increase in vocations to the Order. The server was Fr. Alan Moran, O.P. Santa Maria Maggiore is the home of the Sacred Penitentiary of the Roman Church, traditionally staffed by the Dominican Order.
U.S. Hands off the DPRK!
It makes me feel old, of course. 10 years ago I was in college! The pre-Russia memories are fading.
You can have anything that you desire- magic- you know darn well when you cast your spell- you hypnotise with your eyes
Madhu B. Wangu’s Mindful Writing Meditation
2 Medium to large side pieces (I used a couple metal findings that I found at the scrapbook section)
In order to make sure that people who groom children for years until they are either too traumatized to talk, or beyond the statute of limitations to press charges of child sexual abuse, child sexual abuse grooming should hold a felony charge with any charge of child sexual abuse.
Chen, who recorded a video after his daring escape appealing to China’s Premier Wen Jiabao to punish several local officials he said had made his family’s life a misery, is said to want to stay in China.
How about THEM apples? Can we say, ‘Big in Japan’? Yes, we can, these things are bigger than what I’m sporting naturally. And they are home-grown here in the area. We bought them just to take them home, take photos of them, and then eat them, of course!
It contains the full version of my complaint submitted to the BBC at:
18 Melting Pot
They see a smile and assume its alright,
But how did I get dethroned over night
A friend of mine and I were discussing this and we both agree that while the Prothean’s are integral to the Lore and backstory of Mass Effect, the question is, are they important to the plot of the story for Mass Effect 3? What is the plot of Mass Effect 3? Unite the Galaxy and defeat the Reapers. Is the Prothean that important to the story? If the script that was leaked is really that old, it may have been rewritten in a way that would make the character inconsequential and therefore they cut him.
Guess what’s affected by culture? If you guessed people and, by extension, characters, you get a gold star. Culture and understanding culture can give your characters a point of difference and make them more real, giving your story extra depth.
"We've been working really hard over the last few months to give Londoners L’Insitiut Francais’ second comics book festival and have managed to get our hands on some real treats," Angela Sangma Francis told downthtubes.
Gonzales
And that, my friends, is going in the "things I'll never forget" file.
I have driven for eight hours through traffic accidents, wind advisories, rain, and crank addled truckers. I'm two clicks past the Do Long bridge and there are most certainly "gooks on the wire" as the young man from the Bronx once uttered. Geese everywhere you look. Water water everywhere and oh yes, I'd love a drop or three to drink. Ducks. Flights of ducks and then someone says "plate" or "plate of dead ducks" and the whole sorry hallucination starts all over again.
Good morning all.its a horrid day today, lashing it down with rain so i`m hoping it stops before its time for work.already got soaked once taking my son to school.
So the struggle continues. I am good during the day while at work, but when the evening rolls around it’s a nightmare. Last night was one of those crazy nights with too many things going on. So I had some sweet but not too much.
Tip: Add more veggie both as needed for moisture.
Magazines don’t say, 'Gee, there is noting good out there right now, lets just not publish in August.'
Inks: Regal Rose, Daffodil Delight, Tangerine Tango
My series of short stories feature Alana O’Neill, a bookkeeper at her uncle’s antiques mall. She has a booth of kitchenalia and does not like to sell many of her cookbooks. She, like me, loves to try recipes from decades past, even if we are not good at making them. In Blast From the Past, Alana tries to make fancy chili chocolates after a professional baker makes fun of her old cookbooks. Alana is distracted when her teen son slams the door and ends up dumping way too much chili powder into the candy. Blast From
Thankfully, Charlaine’s writing hasn’t suffered any redundancy or monotony. The characters still have depth and undergo continuous evolvement.
Awwww, yeahhh...those were some mighty fine shrimp. Monday dinner, simple, boiled and served up with some melted butter, corn and a colorful bowl of giardiniera including carrots, cauliflower, brilliant yellow peppers and banana peppers. The shrimp I boiled with some bay leaves, cajun seasoning*, cayenne and some lemon juice in the water. Oh, man, was it tasty.
of it all.
Secondly, I still don't know why the Cubs went with the team pose and the White Sox the floating heads in '75 when it was flip-flopped all the other years.
Two weeks ago, I posted with a challenge on accepting oneself, letting go of perfectionism and giving ourselves a break in life from our own inner critic….ahem, I should say giving myself a break from my own inner critic. Last week, I posted on how I’d failed that challenge and what it might actually mean to give up the “I’m not good enough” dialog. It’s a toughy. I have to say, I still had my inner voice this week, but I did find myself stepping into appreciation of me, of my life, of my job, of the people in my life and every time I looked at things from that perspective I had to stop and say–wow! and really did find myself incredibly grateful for my life and all that’s in it right now.
Me: They are definitely mammals....
* 4 large eggs
doodle flower sticker
The first-half was notable for two seemingly clear cut penalties for either team. Sam Schwodler was tackled from behind, then Burridge goalkeeper Ryan Jones brought down an opponent with his arms. Neither side were awarded spot kicks. A busy night of paper work no doubt beckoned for the assessor – had he been anywhere near either of the incidents. One Comrades follower was outraged that his side weren't given a penalty. Burridge manager, Paul Dyke told him that this tied the bad decisions at one-each. The Comrades supporter didn't agree, and the two of them began debating at twenty paces. It was a bit of a stalemate given that the Comrades supporter was similar to Dyke, in being gruffly spoken and forthright with his opinions. Although by the sounds of it the one thing missing from Dyke's opponent was any form of secondary education. So, on reflection, a spilt decision win for Dyke.
I'm offering any of my fellow bloggers a FREE e-design consultation for one room of your choice, IF you will blog about my house for sale on your blog. All I ask is that you kindly follow the rules listed below:
“The best part of blogs like this is that the mere existence of President Obama drives you drooling dittohead rightwing nuts crazy. I love it!” --- some anonymous asstard
I am disappointed with the response of USATF CEO Doug Logan who has chosen to castigate Merritt and focus on the negative when instead this is a moment that should be used for educating Merritt, and in turn the rest of our elite athletes on just how perilous the day to day use of ANY substance can be without proper knowledge! Throwing Merritt or any other athlete under the bus does not fix this problem! Clearly the programs in place at USATF are not getting the job done, and that is where our CEO should start. Merritt is not the first to make such a silly mistake, nor will he be the last, unless we find a way to make sure that our athletes are armed with all the information they need to make the correct decisions.
Tampa, Fl- January 27, 2012 - Finally!! "You Want It You Got It" "The Hottest Band in the World" "KISS"
Salad:
Their casts include everyone from model-turned-AUDITION star Ehi Shiina to burgeoning superstar Takumi Saito. Some, like adorable AV idol Asami and bartender Demo Tanaka, have been with them from the start - and as the directors' films have grown, so have their casts' onscreen talents.
AK: These iconic figures in post war American society loved France — but for such different reasons. Bouvier’s France was esthetic, Sontag’s bohemian, and Davis’s political. These differences allowed me to convey three distinct educational and personal experiences, to offer readers different points of entry into French history and culture.
The Tribunal found Craig Whyte guilty under Rule 66 and fined him £50,000.
And little Joe, just as though
Everyone was very pleased, the men clapped their hands, the women shouted with a loud voice to show their joy saying, “Now our country is being ruled by good people.” Chidziva stood up and said to the people, “Go now to your homes in peace.” Then Chinamaringa, Chidziva, Nzvere and Wafanenombo remained at their home. They gathered together and discussed among themselves who would be chief. Then they said, We were born at Chiweshe and we do not know all about this country and we are still young.” When they left Chiweshe they reached Chishawasha and built their home near Chihungwa’s village. Chihungwa was a good man and he was older than themselves. Chihungwa was the younger brother of Mhembere their father. Then Chinamaringa Chidziva, Nzvere and Wafanenombo said, “We shall give the chieftainship of Chinamora to Chihungwa,” who agreed.
Mat 4:9 And saith unto him, All these things will I give thee, if thou wilt fall down and worship me.
I also remember the food, there was a lot of fast food which was useful as hell. We took a little walk after our morning session. Then we went to a little bistro and I had a lobster sandwich, which at the moment I declare was the best sandwich I’ve ever eaten. Whether or not it is, could probably be disputable.
The man's hand shook
I’ve deliberately chosen blogs that I hadn’t give any sort of award to before.
Thursday night brought a really fun party at Kate McKinnon's house. Kate's house is just as I'd pictured it... a great 50s/60s vibe, and the backyard is filled with wonderment. I spent a lot of time in the kitchen, skewering meat with Andrew Thornton and Jamie Hogsett...
Two days later, House Majority Leader Eric Cantor (R-Va.) declared short-term deals a non-starter and said “there are no votes” for any grand bargain including higher tax revenue.
8. cute polka dot scarf
All because He loves me.
Getting rid of this category. I like going outside of the strictly literary, but not sure that indie rock bands is where I want to go next. A bit of brain-storming led me to think of Josh Topolsky, formerly Editor-in-Chief of Engadget, frequent tech correspondent for Jimmy Fallon, and soon-to-be Editor-in-Chief of a new tech website through SB Nation. Topolsky is a confirmed book nerd, but also a guy right on the front lines of our increasingly digital lives.
DON't forget our Challenge ends on April 9....get those entries in!
The film starred Jennifer Love Hewitt, Ethan Embry, Seth Green, Peter Facinelli and so-on and so-forth. In addition, Can’t Hardly Wait featured a staggering “before-they-were-famous” ensemble cast and other staples from other teen films of the 90s. Don’t believe me? Check out the credits on IMDb.
I awakened this morning to sounds of the rain lightly tapping on the rooftop. I opened the door of the cabin letting the early morning chilled air in, breathing in deeply the smell of balsam and wet pine needles. Birds were just beginning to stir, somewhere in the distance. Looking straight ahead I caught the familiar outline of the Lake Superior lazily waking up under a blanket of clouds and fog.
There is a big difference between giving a sticker for a third-down stop and under-the-table money for sending a player to the hospital. The player to worry about in the latter case isn’t the star of the team. It’s the guy looking for recognition in the locker room or adoration from his teammates, and is willing to compromise another players’ career to obtain it. That is the seedy underbelly; it’s just that it takes place in the locker room, not in a dingy bar.
THANKS for your visit,
I have memories of laughing with a few friends over bowls of hummus and plates of kabobs and tabouli. And that memory is sweet. But not sweeter than the feeling of boundaryless love I experienced as Mr. CFP and I looked into each others eyes at one point during the day. Each moment of life is so ripe and bursting with flavor and possibility, it is very hard to make a human-decided landmark any more special than any other moment. At least for me.
“He must then occupy two months in almost continuous prayer, speaking as little as possible to anybody. At the end of this period he invokes a being described as the Holy Guardian Angel, who appears to him (or to a child employed by him), and who will write in dew upon the Lamen, which is placed upon the Altar. After a period of communion with the Angel, he summons the Four Great Princes of the Daemonic World, and forces them to swear obedience.
Our first evening there featured a torrential downpour. Water was leaking in hallways of our open- air resort. There was almost no place to escape the dampness.
An argument which accepts the simple terms of 'readability' versus 'unreadability' seems to me to sidestep the real issue: it accepts books as fixed by one or the other of two immutable (opposed) characteristics. But this is clearly nonsense. We all like different books. Books some of us find boring others don't. A book I might find difficult to read you perhaps won't. Reading is a dynamic process in which a complex array of things come into play: the reader's taste, mood, expectation and, above all, education - by which I don't mean formal schooling but cultural immersion. We can learn to like and understand books or the kinds of books we may not previously have liked or understood. Of course there are different kinds of books: we can also read in different ways, simply for enjoyment and comfort or to be challenged and made to think and have our perceptions overturned, and different books cater for those different experiences.
Comparing Art Basel to an "art show" would be like comparing a Florida sun shower to the sensory and emotional assault of a category 4 hurricane complete with a tornado and hail storm thrown in for good measure. Prepared or not, you will be introduced to, or immersed in the finest modern art from across the globe.
We can keep talking at length about painful concessions, but as long as on the other side we have blood-thirsty psychopaths capable of knifing an 11-year-old child, a four-year-old boy, and a baby who was just born, such talk would mostly be futile.
Tom Schutzius
How do we come to understand things? Understanding is cumulative. As a child I understood what love is. At least I believed I did. I loved and I was loved. I understood what that felt like. Only now I’m in my fifties can I accept that my definition required significant adjustment and I’m still not sure I’m happy with how I define love. The same goes for loss. I’ve lost pets, acquaintances, one friend that I know of, both parents but I haven’t – and hope I never do – lose my daughter. I’ve misplaced her but she was never lost to me. So I don’t understand what Thomése went through. And I never want to. I do understand his need to understand and why he would turn to words to help him. That is what appealed to me about this book: his struggle with language.
R19: *Sc 4, dec 1*, rep 6 times. (30 sts)
I might not yet have recovered.
..and Ike and Duke.
It would be remiss of me to suggest that Battleship is all bad. Hamish Linklater, an amiable actor who on recent evidence (this, The Future) should change his agent, is quite good as a boffin – he even gets a line complaining about how ludicrous everyone else’s dialogue is. The visual effects are, not surprisingly for a film with a $200m budget, good. And Peter Berg, though clearly under instructions to copy Michael Bay’s style, can’t quite force himself down to the arch-fiend’s level – as a result, you can tell what’s going on most of the time, and there’s relatively little sign of inappropriate intimacy between the director and the frame. And some of the early action with the navy fighting the aliens is actually quite involving and thrilling – but then Rihanna goes past in a dinghy firing a machine-gun, and you’re smacked round the head by how silly it all really is.
riches to men of understanding, not yet favour to men of skill….” This is the reason
A + D = G
A more light-hearted theory – my own – is that the morning after the kind of night where a woman wears eyeliner, the kind of night that includes a passionate throw-down, we all look a little like Alice Cooper.
Invert the bottle top (funnel) into the bottle. It should be a snug fit (given the equal diameter of the funnel top and bottle shaft), but if necessary, secure it with tape.
Its a while since I read prose live, but in the distant past (1999!) I set up a one-off night in a bar called "Wrote for Luck" where myself, Lee Rourke and his friend Doug read from our "works in progress." Performance prose needs to have some of the immediacy of performance poetry to really work - and last night's readers were primarily funny, first person and in the present tense; only Joe Stretch's work in progress moving from that template. I remember going to see Mark Powell read in the early 00s in Islington at a regular night that had DBC Pierre on the following week (this was just before "Vernon God Little" won the Booker) and it did seem that prose was the new rock 'n' roll.
Where had her birth record gone?!
Parents, eh? You can't live with them, and you can't afford to live without them. Yesterday I went on a wee day out with my Dad, to cement the whole "Father-Daughter Bonding" thing. What a drag... Not that I don't love my Dad but he can be a bit of an old fart, as well as pretty damn embarrassing. Anywhoo, we headed to a bookstore.
were the manner of my mania —-
One side note: this is something where you start with basically nothing; just maybe an outline, or character ideas, notes, whatever – but the point is that you start something fresh, not something half-written already. You write said novel in that month. Since I’ve only ever written a very basic outline, and one snippet of dialogue between two characters for my Dystopian novel, “The Wilds People”, I want to use this as my platform to get on with it already.
- little dewdrop gems in the centres of three of the flowers - added later
Nobel Prize-winning physicist whose crowd-sourcing philosophy is gaining traction in the university classroom. bit.ly/tOCGtM
2. Link back to their blog.
Interviewer: Yes.
Hey tribe, Erin here. I’m volunteering as a running buddy with Girls on the Run and the girls have inspired my sisters and I to write a series of posts about some of our favorite girly running products. It’s not easy to look like the girl you are while running long distance in the heat of the summer, especially with the humidity here in NC, so it’s an extra bonus when you look and feel like a girl when crossing the finish line of a race (photo op anyone?). Look for our series of athletic beauty posts over the next couple of months. Including this one about hair!
By using this approach Warsi is actually calling for the Islamic Ummah in the UK to unite against any kind of movement that threatens their progress towards an Islamic state in the UK ,and then when violence does erupt she will be able to say that it is the divisive EDL and BNP tactics that have made Muslims defend themselves, she is setting up the EDL and BNP to take the rap
To give some examples, I think of a scene in Werner Herzog’s movie Grizzly Man where the viewer does not hear the audio tape of Timothy Treadwell’s death, but instead witnesses Herzog listening briefly, then placing the head phones down. The activation of the imagination here is reverential to Treadwell (not playing to the spectacle of his death) through an activation of the imagination through removed details. To cite another instance, critics have praised Claude Lanzmann’s masterpiece of Holocaust documentary Shoah, 1985, for its ability to linger inside of your heart, not out of bluntness but out of style, out of allowing testimony rather than the horrors of images to relate the trauma. Both Herzog and Lanzmann activate the moral imagination rather than deaden it through blunt force. There is a reason why I continue to cling to another of Trilling’s thoughts that the direct contemplation of cruelty cannot help but make us cruel ourselves—because I suspect it to be right.
With her exuberant prose and exquisite sensitivity to the natural world, Diane Ackerman engages us viscerally in the lives of the zoo animals, their keepers, and their hidden visitors. She shows us how Antonina refused to give in to the penetrating fear of discovery, keeping alive an atmosphere of play and innocence even as Europe crumbled around
We arrived in the UK on Friday afternoon and the weather was avercast but not raining.
Steve Perry – Vocals
Trying to justify her purchase, she tells me, "Yes, but now I don't have to take those showers. I save time and money with these technological marvels.".
In any event, here is my family's favorite CC cookie recipe. This is a rich, chewy, full of chocolate chunks cookie, with a generous pinch of Oh.My.God.
Companies Involved in Diphtheria Therapeutics Development 19
Okay, so I’m Catholic. A practicing Catholic. And I am therefore supposed to (required to) go to church every Sunday. I am also (super old school here) supposed to tithe, i.e. give 10% of my income to the church. However, since I have a very modest (okay, pathetic) income and basically live off my husband, I’m just going to pretend, for the purposes of giving myself one day a week off from this blog, that I’m making $365,000 a year and go from there. So every Sunday – all year long –I’m going to be giving $100 to Our Lady of Lourdes, my amazing, adorable church in the heart of the Martin Luther King Jr. Landmark district in Atlanta.
Holy Spririt, Fargo ND Cookbook
-The early 70s brought us the brief, yet memorable, Night Gallery from Rod Serling. Like the Twilight Zone, but less Serling control. Night Gallery featured the directorial debut of a young Steven Spielberg and was even parodied on The Simpsons: Treehouse of Horror IV.
I once read that she doesn’t like the way her nose appears when she smiles so to prevent happening, whatever it is she thinks will happen, she doesn’t smile on purpose.
Over the past year I have corralled a small herd of ponies.
"In Arms of Nothing" intros with the same badass bass than Interminable Night started with....
For the past month the town has been preparing for its three days of Saturnalian festivities . Flags and banners line the 4km stretch of highway that our small municipality occupies, creating a tunnel of colorfully waving and fluttering advertisements. Within the poblacion, vendors selling hammers, underwear, educational posters, and sunglasses constrict the highway, the rice river. Crowds of people, eager to view the necessities of life, dam up the flow unknowingly creating a cacophony of furious honking.
'Fore damask roses.
94. Clubs. Join a club. Find a group of folks with similar interests as you.
The Gods are angry and ancient Greece will suffer their wrath! The Doctor, Rory and Amy face the mighty Zeus himself in Part Two of the new comic strip adventure, The Chains of the Olympus, written by Scott Gray and drawn by Mike Collins.
After the w?ekend of using some of m? new baits, I ?m ?ostly disappointed. If I had only picked u? that other s?ecial hologram version in the passion pu?ple, I just might have caught myself that trophy fish. Darn, ne?t time.
Strange Packaging is my first Young Adult novel. It’s about a half American/half Korean singer by the name of Micha West who has been recruited by a Korean entertainment manager and brought to Korea to be a part of an up and coming pop group, Revolution. Despite what manager Hyun-Gi Rahn says, the current leader of the group, arrogant and spoiled Ran-Hanuel doesn’t think his group needs a fourth male singer, since Hyun-Gi originally went to America to recruit a female lead. Micha is about the right height and has the perfect look for the group, but if Revolution was going to take on a new member it had to be a girl so they could compete against the rival band Sensei, who was rocking the crowd with their female lead singer Sun-Jae Na. And he doesn’t really know if Micha can even sing. Micha finally gets a chance to audition for Revolution and knocks the three male members off their feet with his deep sultry voice.
They have the awful side effect of discouraging companies to grow and innovate. Industries can die off because of the threat of litigation, or because the regulations make it simply too expensive for the industry to survive. Sometimes this is deliberate: we just survived the EPA banning lead ammunition, something that could well kill off hunting and recreational shooting in the country. The requested regulation was a back-door attempt to do something that can't be passed as a law.
After basking in the cool temperatures (n.b. Austin is on Day 55 or 58 or more of 100+ degrees), we headed down into Chicago to spend some more time with Bill & Kathryn at their home. Days were spent at the Botanical Gardens, Creed & Evan played - or more likely observed - golf with Bill & his son, had a little beach time and took a day trip into almost Iowa to look at an old movie theatre that needs Evan's restoration expertise.
Some writers have broad appeal, usually because they are skilled, talented, clever. They also have a knack to figure out and write what will be popular. Nevertheless, I contend that every writer can find an audience, even if it is an audience of one.
The CGNA meets at the Hannah Senesh Community Day School, 342 Smith St (1st & 2nd Pl) on the Fourth Wednesday of each month (except for school holidays in *February and *April).
Bootleggers and the Speak Easy become the norm.
With special Guests MyChildren MyBride, Upon a Burning Body and More
And yet, they have. Our traditional right-wing parties, such as the Conservative Party and the Liberals (presently in power) aren’t options. In most people’s minds they represent the worst sides of capitalism, such as greed, egoism, selfishness and upper-class mentality — to say nothing about high treason by being a fifth column for the EU. But a relatively new political party came into existence about a decade ago, namely “The Danish People’s Party”.
It looks like I made some progress to me. Soon I'll be able to reach all corners of the room. The things I want near me until the end will have some tape on the back with the name of who I would like to give it to. (Yes, Mel, the mountain pics are yours!)
Nov 12th – O2 Academy Newcastle
Sleeping beauty fell asleep ages ago. And he doesn’t want to wake up yet. Why should he? It’s quiet. Only the sheep and the wind make their soft noises.
Yesterday was Astronomy Day, which is another reason it seems appropriate to start with Daniel. When we meet him, he’s operating telescopes at Kitt Peak National Observatory. In fact, he’s been a night assistant, helping astronomers, for nearly a century. His first job was assisting Percival Lowell observe the canals on Mars near the end of the eighteenth century. One night at the observatory, he was attacked by a vampire and left for dead. In the struggle, Daniel consumed some of his attacker’s blood and became a vampire himself. Being a creature of the night and a loner from the beginning, Daniel adapted easily to his life as a vampire.
This week's challenge is set by me....Jane. I decided to choose a theme of:-
We are the only solution.
155 – Olivier Aubin-Mercier (1-0) submits Guy Poulin (1-1) via rear-naked choke at 0:58 of Round 1.
Here's the piece I was stitching the other day - done, except for the facing. That will have to wait till next week. The unquilted top was in my book and I decided it would make a good 12x12. Almost done.
Article 122
Police seized an R5 police rifle and a number of pistols.
Your letter involving ongoing problems with your neighbors has been forwarded to the Professional Standards Office for further investigation. A deputy will be contacting you.
Despite, the fast growing pace of the Indian economy, and the increasing importance of copyright policy towards India’s trade and commerce the sanctioned strength of the Copyright Office has remained static and in fact things are worse today because even the sanctioned strength of the Copyright Office has not be fulfilled. As per the RTI reply, of the 17 sanctioned posts at the Copyright Office, around 8 are lying empty i.e. a 47% vacancy. When I asked the Ministry the steps that were being taken to fill the vacancies, I was informed that the same was not within the purview of the RTI Act! In a similarly worded RTI to the DIPP, the DIPP provided me with a detailed reply on the steps being taken to fill the vacancies at the Patents and Trademark Office.
Damon, whose life is delimited by his damaged heart, emerges here as the grandest spirit in a small body since Antoine de Saint-Exupery imagined The Little Prince.
11. Do any foods bring back bad memories?
- Oracle of Ages is slightly lengthier than Oracle of Seasons.
Until you know what or who the very best is for you, please, protect yourself. Don't allow yourself to be devalued and belittled by those who merely want to use you. God will provide the best, and He will do it to His own timing.
sat down together on the burgundy leather sofa in our living room, I realized this
He waken up by one of the trouble makers, brought to the rest of the Korean crew which has to face their death! Yeah, right. They will be killed by the non-Korean crew. Because they are upset and can’t forgive the treatment they had to face
December 8
10.Dear Prudence (The Beatles cover)
If Greece did return to the drachma, the currency’s value would be pummeled by foreign-exchange markets, making Greek products and tourism a value. Because imports would become very expensive, there would be no choice but to increase domestic production. There would also be uncertainty: Greece doesn’t have the same material resources as Argentina does nor does it have export industries as strong, so it is impossible to say that Greece would rebound as fast as Argentina did a decade ago. Taking the “Argentina option” would be a gamble and would have to be accompanied by capital controls and the nationalization of banks.
If you'd like to see your name on the byline of an article, but you have no idea what to write about, just pick any topic -- let's say "shopping" -- and write an article called "Shopping Is Dead."
Mogulof said that the police would maintain a “stepped up presence” on the property for awhile. He said if the University hadn’t taken action, a whole year’s worth of research could have been lost.
Fifth and sixth on the top row: Ornament and butterfly from Alissa. I've got to post a video of this butterfly, it moves in the jar by itself and it is one of my favorite gifts so far. I always think of Mikayla's spirit speaking to me when I see that little butterfly flutter on it's own.
I really like what Chuck Smith wrote in one of his commentaries about this:
Apparently, Umno politicians never have sex. They’re sexless. Maybe that’s why people say Umno members and Umno ministers have no balls to do right.
15 Bird Song
The little baby llamas were really cute. The girls were cute till they became greedy and wouldn't split the generous tip we gave them amongst themselves and each wanted more money. All they did was pose. They didn't sing or dance or anything.
French’s Save $.30/1 Classic Yellow or Spicy Brown Mustard (5/31)
- The challenge will be every Monday thru Sunday 9pm EST
We learned that the tyrannosaur of the title was one who escaped the life on offer, but not without a spell as a blind, double amputee. Still, she was someone to envy, the one who got away. The other one who got away was found slumped in blood against a wardrobe circled by flies. A wake following the funeral of a third lucky, lucky dead bastard was the high point, the cheery bit, the laughs to offset the pain.
Anyway, back to my walk. Here's some good news. I must be one of the luckiest people in Britain, because I live a stone’s throw from a public library that has been refurbished.
Williams is especially good at getting the two different sides of Monroe, and showing how she switches from one to the other when the cameras start rolling or adoring fans move into sight. Suddenly she is Marilyn, and striking her famous poses. At times Branagh’s re-creation of Olivier’s mannered way of speaking might border on caricature, but I think he just about gets away with it, as one great Shakespearean actor/director paying homage to another. And he also has scenes suggesting the insecurity beneath the brilliance, especially one where he looks into the mirror at his face, and says one or two lines anticipating a later film, The Entertainer. Writer Adrian Hodges portrays Olivier as quite similar to the Grandduke – he too is determined and demanding and wants to get his own way, with constant clashes between him and Monroe. As I’m a big fan of Olivier, I found I was automatically more sympathetic to his character than I should really have been in terms of the script!
Far more tricky is getting to Charlotte. A trip to the national convention is a plum reserved for long-time party loyalists and hacks of individual candidates. The entire party machinery is in the hands of the obot apparatchiks. In theory, however, the Democratic Party is the people’s party, and any registered Democrat is eligible to serve as an “undeclared” delegate. And you, dear reader, are going to be that delegate.
In addition, Petrino had circumvented university policies to fast-track hiring her. He had requested and received a waiver to bypass a stipulation that open jobs remain vacant for 30 days prior to interviews being conducted. Moreover, unbeknownst to the university, Petrino personally had given a $20,000 gift to Dorrell during her first week on the job so that she could buy a car.
The Fat Bigot cannot be classified in any category – a retired barrister, he writes as he finds…. with precision and a degree of sardonic humour; Resigned or frustrated : “I find it hard to write anything these days. It’s not that there is nothing to write about, just in the last couple of weeks we’ve had the EU bullying Ireland at the behest of Germany, a multi-million pound talking shop farce in Mexico, the first guilty plea from a former MP who defrauded the public purse, the strengthening of the food police and people rioting about nothing in London. Yet I haven’t been stirred to action. I’m trying to work out why….”
Yet, while they prepare for ultimate survival, they appear to be suffering from life itself. Most of them are driving cars with mismatched doors, or old pickups with V8s so large they are definitely drinking away a major chunk of canned-food money. Concerning yourself with surviving a catastrophe, when you are barely surviving as it is? Maybe it’s just a form of escapism. I do not claim to know. I do know however, that the children look beaten down at 7-8 years old. They cringe and look terrified as nutty old Dad shows ‘em how to “far” an AK-47, pistol, or other implement of death. They try to look normal sitting in a burlap shirt eating crickets that good ol’ Dad and homely, stupid, down-trodden Mom gave them. They try to smile (as kids should do) while suffering from an environment of ignorance, paranoia, and neglect – due to crazed priorities set by crazy parents. So, I wish these kids well. I hope that one day they are able to laugh and play hide and seek on the lawn, without a family member jumping out to disembowel them while they’re tangled in trip wire. If you really think our world is that doomed, why did you bring innocent children into the picture in the first place? Oh, I gotcha… amongst all the crazy shit you can plan for, I guess buying condoms was too complicated? Or maybe you tried to make them at home out of plastic wrap and a rubber band? Good call.
If someone merely avoids bringing suffering into their own life by avoiding animal products they personally purchase, but do nothing to prevent the exploitation and cruelty of animals which they know is going on beyond their own little life, it would seem to more easily fit the criteria of ‘welfarist’, which isn’t vegan.
Collage of items collected on a summer’s walk – 2nd
Nothig else to update on today , Until tomorrow Over and out
Not a god. Not an ultimate power or universal consciousness. Gods. Many, without number. All individual, with their own names, personalities, litanies, preferences. All with their own preferred level of involvement with humanity.
Our thoughts would pleasantly agree
First, my amazing cover artist, Holly Robbins, finished the book cover for Rising Book 1: Resistance today. (In case I haven't clarified before, this isn't a long series; this is the first of two books. I was trying to write one single book, but there ended up being too much story to tell and I had to divide it into two.)
Exercise: A: Walked dogs
Of the 20 or so books on my immediate To Be Read pile, it seems to me that the majority of them have a very specific angle or incorporate multiple genres. Let's have a sample...
Furthermore, whatever she said, is that really good enough?
He should have stood up and said, look, these things are a disaster; this is a crisis. He should have been anxiously telling the American people that these entities were causing a housing bubble that would cause a collapse that we’ve seen here in Florida and around the country. And are they a problem today? Absolutely. They’re offering mortgages, again to people who can’t possibly repay them. We’re creating another housing bubble, which will hurt the American people.
Sadly, many of you never got to see the incredible sets of NBC's The Playboy Club (replicated to a bunny's ear on location in Chicago) and the sixties modern apartment interiors designed by production designer Scott Murphy, art director Gary Baugh and set decorators Beauchamp Fontaine and Tricia Schneider. I was working with one of the shelter publications on a set design story (which will not come to pass) and happy to share this incredible work with you.
I love every color, it all comes from you,
In a stroke of luck, the Sith struck with both blades at once, which Ken caught and held for a moment to allow his opponent’s backswing to lend him some strength. Timing his moves with the natural retreat of the Sith’s strike, Ken spun his staff end over end, twirling the Sith’s blades in a tight circle in a move that was designed to use his opponent’s greater strength to Ken’s advantage. At the apex of his twirl, Ken took a step forward and, drawing on the Force to augment his strength, shoved the defensive end of his staff as hard as he could.
I’m an outspoken ass. I speak my mind, and don’t really give a damn what you think. I learned a long time ago that everyone likes to think they’re right, even when they know they’re not. I learned that if I tried to be respectful and soft-spoken about what I think, I would either be criticized or no one would even realize I was there. I learned that almost everyone in this day and age resents anyone who doesn’t think like they do.
Then tell me again how the arts doesn’t have value.
2tbsp caster sugar
Those children they pretend to care about today will mean nothing to them tomorrow if as adults they chose to smoke or consider themselves to be a smoker.
. . . As a result of a March 2003 decision from the Federal Court of Appeal ("Barton"), small entity status is determined at the time that the patent regime is first engaged, normally at the time of filing the application and is not changed after that, regardless of subsequent transfers or licenses. In other words, the determination of entity status need only be made once.
so there you have it: Ronin's room, in a condensed board.
Xypherous: This is not good. You’re supposed to submit to my machinations and work to get Iron Stylus unto the Summoner Showcase.
Most of his students are absolute beginners, adults who have always wanted to learn to draw and who have always wanted to go to Italy. If this sounds like you, then this is your chance!
Krew De'Etat, Morpheus, and Hermes were the parades on Friday nite. We thought they said "Herpies" as the parade name,so the locals really got a kick out of those two crazy oregonians. Friday night we had signs saying "love from Oregon". That was the best idea we had all weekend! I got so many piles of beads thrown right at me- it was great!! The locals just thought we were the most exuberant, happy people that they'd met in a long time because it was all so new to us. If anyone wants a good, clean Mardi Gras parade experience, head down to the corner of St. Charles and St. Joseph. On the south side of the street, on the East corner, go down about 1 building. There you will find the nicest, sweetest locals who will give you the best advice on what beads to get.
